<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891017-0036 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-17-89.f2.A1035</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 199 / Tuesday, October 17, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Food and Drug Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">21 CFR Part 1020</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 82N-0274]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Federal Performance Standard for Diagnostic X-Ray Systems and TheirMajor Components </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is proposing technicalamendments to the Federal performance standard for diagnostic  X-ray systemsand their major components (the performance standard). Experience gainedby FDA in administering the performance standard has shown the need forproposing these changes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments by January 16, 1990. FDA is proposing that anyfinal rule based on this proposal be effective 30 days after the date ofits publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, except that FDA is proposing that the amendmentto andSection; 1020.31(c) <T3>Linearity </T3>(21 CFR 1020.31(c)) be effective 1 year after the dateof publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Written comments to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA-305),Food and Drug Administration, Rm. 4-62, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD20857.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Samuel Fleisher, Center for Devicesand Radiological Health (HFZ-84), Food and Drug Administration, 5600 FishersLane, Rockville, MD 20857, 301-443-4874.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>Under the Public Health Service Act, as amended by the Radiation Controlfor Health and Safety Act of 1968 (Pub. L. 90-602, 42 U.S.C. 263b <T3>et seq.</T3>), FDA is proposing to amend the performance standard fordiagnostic X-ray systems and their major components, andSection;andSection;1020.30, 1020.31, and 1020.32 (21 CFR 1020.30, 1020.31, and 1020.32). Inthe <T4>Federal Register </T4>of August 15, 1972 (37 FR 16461), the performancestandard was published as a final rule, which became effective on August1, 1974. Since that time, there have been several amendments to the performancestandard. These amendments take into account new technology, clarify misinterpretedprovisions, and encourage the improvement of uncertified systems manufacturedbefore the performance standard became effective. (See, e.g., those publishedOctober 7, 1974 (39 FR 36008); February 25, 1977 (42 FR 10983); September2, 1977 (42 FR 44230); November 8, 1977 (42 FR 58167); May 22, 1979 (44FR 29653); August 24, 1979 (44 FR 49667); November 30, 1979 (44 FR 68822);and April 25, 1980 (45 FR 27927).) A cost-benefit analysis of several significantelements of the performance standard led to amendments of the provisionsgoverning assembly/reassembly of diagnostic X-ray equipment (August 24,1979; 44 FR 49667).Thus, in the 14 years since the promulgation of the standard, FDA has gainedexperience in administering it and believes that more amendments may nowbe appropriate. Further, Executive Order 12291 encourages Federal agenciesto assess existing regulations for possible significant impacts on theprivate sector, and the Regulatory Flexibility Act (Pub. L. 96-354) requiresall agencies to review existing regulations that can have an impact onsmall manufacturers. In addition, FDA has always believed that, for regulatorycontrols to be appropriate, FDA must devise them so that they are coordinatedwith educational programs, voluntary standards, professional practices,and controls imposed at the State and local levels. For all of these reasons,FDA has believed that it was appropriate to look at the performance standardwith a fresh perspective.On March 8, 1982, FDA's Center for Devices and Radiological Health (CDRH)established an ad hoc working group to analyze and review the performancestandard. This X-Ray Standard Review Group (XSRG) was charged with assessingthe costs and public health benefits of the performance standard and withdeveloping recommendations on both regulatory and nonregulatory radiationcontrol programs for consideration by FDA. Accordingly, on November 16,1982 (47 FR 51710), FDA published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice of intent to review the X-ray performancestandard and invited comments, data, and information that might be usefulin the review. FDA received 38 comments on the notice. In addition to thecomments, over 200 individuals and groups requested materials and reportsthat might be generated in the review. In November 1982, the members ofthe XSRG attended a meeting of the Radiological Society of North Americaand personally solicited comments and information from 6 professional societiesand representatives of 33 manufacturers; their comments proved useful inguiding the XSRG's efforts.The first phase of the XSRG's retrospective review resulted in a reportentitled, ``An Overview of the Costs and Benefits of the Diagnostic X-RayEquipment Performance Standard (21 CFR 1020.30-32),'' which was circulatedfor extramural review and comment on January 24, 1984 (Ref. 3). FDA received10 comments on that report, and it was made available as a final reportin September 1984.The second phase of the XSRG's two-phase review resulted in a report issuedin July 1985 entitled, ``Retrospective Review of the Performance Standardfor Diagnostic X-Ray Systems and their Major Components (21 CFR 1020.30-32).''(Ref. 4) The data contained in the first report's overview of the costsand benefits were used extensively in that second report. The XSRG tookinto account those relatively hard data, considerations advanced in publiccomments, and CDRH's experience in the administration and enforcement ofthe performance standard. In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of November 12, 1985 (50 FR 46646), FDA announcedthe availability of the July 1985 report. FDA received 25 comments, 22from outside FDA and 3 from inside FDA. These comments were analyzed bythe XSRG and CDRH and incorporated into draft proposed amendments to theperformance standard. On May 8, 1987, FDA distributed these draft proposedamendments to the general public for comment. FDA received nine lettersof comment from individual manufacturers, manufacturer organizations, andState and local health agencies. Subsequently, the draft proposed amendmentswere discussed publicly at the June 22 through 23, 1987, meeting of theTechnical Electronic Product Radiation Safety Standards Committee (TEPRSSC),a statutory advisory committee (42 U.S.C. 263f(f)) that FDA is requiredto consult before it may prescribe any electronic product performance standardunder the Radiation Control for Health and Safety Act of 1968 (Pub. L.90-602, 42 U.S.C. 263b <T3>et seq.</T3>) (Ref. 1). TEPRSSC generally concurred with publicationof the draft proposed amendments for public comment (Ref. 2).In response to the comments and to the recommendations of TEPRSSC, FDAhas prepared these proposed amendments to the performance standard. FDAbelieves that the amendments proposed herein would clarify and simplifythe performance standard, would reduce significantly the regulatory burdenon affected manufacturers without compromising the public health, and generallywould improve the effectiveness of FDA's regulation of diagnostic X-rayequipment. However, comments and supporting data concerning the proposedamendments would be particularly helpful to the agency during its preparationof any final rule based on this proposal. Accordingly, FDA is proposingthe following amendments to the performance standard. <ITAG tagnum="85">II. Proposed Amendments to the Standard for Diagnostic X-Ray Systemsand Their Major Components</ITAG>A. Applicability (andSection; 1020.30(a))FDA proposes to revise the standards to add computed tomography (CT) gantryto the list of specified components and to indicate that the date of manufactureof the CT gentry is considered to be the date of manufacture of the CTsystem. In a letter dated August 21, 1985, to manufacturers of computed tomographyX-ray systems, CDRH stated that the CT amendment published in the August31, 1984, <T4>Federal Register </T4>were applicable to entire CT systems and notto the individual components comprising the system. Although the majorcomponents specified in andSection; 1020.30(a) (21 CFR 1020.30)), such asbeam-limiting devices, tube housing assemblies, etc., must still be individuallycertified and compatible with the CT gantry, the gantry itself must alsobe certified and must display both certification and identification labels.The letter further stated that FDA was defining the date of manufactureof the gantry as the date of manufacture of the CT system. TEPRSSC unanimouslyagreed with the proposed change (Ref. 2). B. Definitions (andSection; 1020.30(b)) FDA proposes to revise some definitions in andSection; 1020.30(b) and alsoto incorporate new definitions into the regulation. The definitions willbe alphabetically arranged rather than sequentially numbered. From time to time, formal advisory opinions or letters in response to individualqueries from manufacturers have been necessary to clarify various definitionsof terms used in the standard or to define new terms. These revised andnew terms are now being incorporated into the proposed amendments. Elimination of the sequential numbering of the definitions in favor ofan alphabetical sequence will facilitate any future modifications and makeit easier for the reader to locate definitions. TEPRSSC unanimously agreedwith the proposed changes (Ref. 2). C. Certification of Components (andSection; 1020.30(c))FDA proposes to simplify andSection; 1020.30(c) by removing excess verbiage,redundancies, and unnecessarily complex statements. In addition, the portionof andSection; 1020.30(f)(1) on limits of responsibility of the manufactureris relevant to the requirements of andSection; 1020.30(c) and would be incorporatedhere for clarity; existing requirements of both sections would be retainedin the proposed amendment. Also, FDA proposes to rename andSection; 1020.30(c)``Manufacturer's responsibility.'' TEPRSSC agreed with the proposed changes(Ref. 2). D. Certification by Assembler (andSection; 1020.30(d))FDA proposes to simplify and rename andSection; 1020.30(d) ``Assemblers'responsibility.'' The portion regarding reporting noncompatibility wouldbe deleted, and reloaded or replacement tube housing assemblies and accessorycomponents would be exempted from assembler reporting requirements. Theportion of andSection; 1020.30(f) on assemblers' responsibilities would berelocated here for clarity. This paragraph deals primarily with the information that the assembleris required to provide in the Report of Assembly. The regulation containsdetailed instruction for completing the Report of Assembly which are duplicatedin the report itself. The Report of Assembly was recently revised to deleteunnecessary information and to make the report more efficient. This causedthe reports to be technically out of compliance with the regulation inthat some information required by the current standard was deleted fromthe report. Assemblers, manufacturers, and the States were involved inmaking the changes by an informal notice and comment procedure. By referringto the Reports of Assembly in the standard rather than listing the requirements,FDA could change the report format as necessary without amending the standard.The requirement of completing a prescribed Report of Assembly is stillretained in the proposed amendment. The paragraph on reporting noncompatibility is now unnecessary since certifiedcomponent compatibility is covered by (1) andSection; 1020.30(g) Informationto be provided to assemblers, which requires manufacturers to provide specificationof components compatible with those to be installed when compliance ofthe system with the standard depends on their compatibility; and by (2)the retained provisions of andSection; 1020.30(d), which require the assemblerto affirm that he has followed the manufacturers' instructions for assemblyand has assembled only those components required by andSection;andSection;1020.31 through 1020.33. Therefore, FDA proposes to remove this reportingrequirement. The problem of noncompatibility of components lies primarily with the combiningof certified and uncertified components. The Report of Assembly does notprovide instructions for this kind of assembly because the regulationsdo not require a Report of Assembly for uncertified components. Additionally,only certified components in a mixed assembly are subject to the performancestandard, and then only if their compliance does not depend on an uncertifiedcomponent in the system. Finally, the available supply of uncertified components is dwindling, whichwill eventually obviate the need for this paragraph. FDA's main concernis that fully certified systems be initially installed in a compliant manner.Because there is already an active and comprehensive surveillance programto ensure this, deletion of the noncompatibility paragraph will not representany increased exposure to the patient or have any adverse effect on currentindustry or FDA practices. The requirement for reporting of reloaded and replacement tube housingassemblies and accessory components would be eliminated under the proposalbecause assembly of these components will have little or no effect on theradiation safety of the system, and FDA is not currently using these reportsfor followup. Only Reports of Assembly of major components are enteredinto the database. TEPRSSC supported the proposal to exempt reloaded and replacement tubehousing assemblies and certified accessory components from the reportingrequirements because traceability is managed through serial numbers maintainedby the manufacturer (Ref. 2). FDA notes that the Report of Assembly was never intended as a traceabilitydocument but as an affirmation by the assembler that the components wereassembled correctly. It is FDA's opinion that the report is necessary forwhole systems being put together and for major components or groups ofmajor components installed rather than for tube housing reloads, the majorportion of which occurs on CT systems. E. Identification of X-ray Components (andSection; 1020.30(e))FDA proposes to add a sentence to andSection; 1020.30(e) requiring the useof the word ``model'' or ``type'' on the identification label of certifiedcomponents to identify the model designation.This amendment incorporates information in FDA Compliance Policy Guide(CPG) 7133.03, dated October 1, 1980, which requires the word ``model''or ``type'' to appear as part of the manufacturer's required identificationof certified X-ray components. CPG 7133.03 is included in FDA's CPG Manual.(See 21 CFR 20.26 and 20.107.) In the past, manufacturers have used a varietyof words to identify the model, such as: catalog number, part number, style,etc. In some cases, these model designations were not unique to the component,and some labels have had two designations, for example, a catalog numberand a style number. This has led to confusion on the part of the assemblerin reporting the certified components and on the part of FDA investigatorstrying to identify the components. By restricting the wording allowed formodel designation, FDA proposes to assure that there will be uniformitythroughout the industry, which should alleviate the confusion. TEPRSSCunanimously agreed with the proposed change (Ref. 2).F. Limits of Responsibility (andSection; 1020.30(f))FDA proposes to remove and reserve andSection; 1020.30(f). Section 1020.30(f)(1)would be incorporated into a proposed revision to andSection; 1020.30(c)Certification of components and andSection; 1020.30(f)(2) would be combinedwith the proposed revision to andSection; 1020.30(d) Certification by assembler.TEPRSSC unanimously agreed with these proposed changes (Ref. 2).G. Information to be Provided to Assemblers (andSection; 1020.30(g))FDA proposes that part of andSection; 1020.30(h) Information to be providedfor users also be incorporated into andSection; 1020.30(g). Currently, andSection;1020.30(h) concerns electrical requirements. Because the assembler usuallyworks in conjunction with the users in determining what the electricalrequirements of the system are and what the facility can provide, thisinformation may also remain in the user information section of the manualsprovided by industry. The information would not necessarily have to beincluded in the assembler's manual as long as the assembler receives boththe assembler and user manuals and the instructions say that the assembler'smanual consists of both documents.Although the user has the responsibility for making arrangements for adequateelectrical power lines, this is usually done in consultation with the assembler.Thus, the required electrical power information would also be placed inthe information provided to assemblers to ensure a compliant installation.TEPRSSC was in agreement with the change (Ref. 2).H. Beam Quality (andSection; 1020.30(m) (1) and (2))FDA proposes to modify Table I in andSection; 1020.30(m)(1) so that the transitionpoint at 50 kilovolts peak (kVp) allows for the lesser half-value layerup to and including 50 kVp.The 50 and 70 kVp values in Table I of andSection; 1020.30(m)(1) are pointsat which the inherent filtration in the beam is usually increased. Historically,this derives from the recommendation of the National Council on RadiationProtection and Measurements (NCRP) on minimum filtration. Normally, onewould tend to state kVp ratings by decades, such as ``up to 50 kVp,'' ratherthan using less common numbers such as 38 or 49 kVp. The 70 kVp value takesthis into account since 1.5 millimeters (mm) aluminum equivalent half-valuelayer will meet the standard up to (and including) 70 kVp. This is nottrue for the transition at 50 kVp, where a system would have to be ratedonly up to 49 kVp or would have to have additional filtration added. Manufacturershave presented convincing arguments that it is impractical to design asystem that provides technique selection only up to 49 kVp, because theconvention for kVp ratings is usually in decade steps, and the common guages/indicatorsare in decade ranges. This argument is particularly crucial for mammographysystems. Because of the way Table I is constructed, manufacturers of 50kVp mammography systems must provide the additional filtration requiredby the standard. The manufacturers have shown this to be unacceptable becausemammographic examinations are usually performed at less than 50 kVp (theprimary reason for the 50 kVp selection being design simplicity) wherethe lesser amount of filtration is needed. Thus, the manufacturer has to``lock out'' the 50 kVp selection to meet the requirements of the standard.Because the value of the kVp chosen in Table I is somewhat arbitrary, thechange would not be significant and would alleviate the design problemsfor the manufacturer. TEPRSSC agreed with the amendment (Ref. 2).In andSection; 1020.30(m)(2), FDA proposes to add the word ``selectable''between the words ``maximum'' and ``quantity.'' Manufacturers have sometimesinterpreted the requirement as currently worded to call for the maximumquantity of charge that is used for a particular exposure technique, andnot necessarily to call for the maximum charge attainable, by design, atthat exposure technique. The intent of the standard, which this proposedchange would make clear, is for the system to be charged as fully as possibleat the selected technique when performing the compliance test. (See HHSPublication FDA 84-8221, dated November, 1983, p. 55.) TEPRSSC unanimouslyagreed with the proposed change (Ref. 2).I. Aluminum Equivalent of Material Between Patient and Image Receptor (andSection;1020.30(n))FDA proposes to add tabletops with articulated joints and cantileveredtabletops along with the maximum allowable aluminum equivalence for theseto Table II in andSection; 1020.30(n). A definition of cantilevered tabletopwould also be added to andSection; 1020.30(b).The amendment to andSection; 1020.30(n) would create the following limits:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><H1> </H1><H1> </H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Stationary tabletop without articulated joints <D>1.0 mm. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop with radiolucent panel having one articulated joint <D>1.5 mm. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop with radiolucent panel having two or more articulated joints<D>2.0 mm. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cantilevered tabletop <D>2.0 mm.</D></ITAG></ITAG>Because stretchers with a radiographic and/or fluoroscopic capability arereally a type of X-ray table, they are not separately defined in proposedandSection; 1020.30(b) and are not referred to as such in Table II of andSection;1020.30(n). Instead, the definition for ``X-ray table,'' which would beadded, is inclusive enough to cover any table with a radiographic/fluoroscopiccapability such as these emergency room and surgical stretchers. This proposal also contains a relaxation of aluminum equivalence limitsfor certain X-ray tables. Manufacturers of tables have for some time relatedproblems concerning the allowable limits in andSection; 1020.30(n) for theirproducts. In particular, for tables with cantilevered tops and for mobilestretchers, manufacturers have argued that they cannot meet the aluminumequivalent limits and provide the structural integrity necessary for patientsafety. A Health Industry Manufacturers Association report entitled ``Applicationof 21 CFR 1020.30(n) Performance Standards for Diagnostic X-Ray SystemTabletops to Mobile Stretchers,'' submitted to FDA on December 10, 1986(Ref. 5), contained a proposal to raise the aluminum equivalent limitsfor stretchers. It provides a comprehensive discussion of stretcher designand use and a rationale for raising the limits. The report states thatthe 1974 standard was based on existing technology and products and, therefore,requirements for stretchers were not considered. Because of this, stretcherswere categorized as stationary tabletops and need to be redefined withconsideration for relaxing the aluminum equivalent limits. Precedents for relaxing the aluminum equivalent limits for cantileveredtabletops and special surgical tables have already been established throughvariances granted to several manufacturers. TEPRSSC concurs with thesechanges (Ref. 2). J. Assembly and Reassembly of Diagnostic X-ray System (andSection; 1020.30(p))FDA proposes to remove and reserve andSection; 1020.30(p). After publicationof the final rule establishing the X-ray standard, manufacturers posedseveral questions on how the standard would apply to the sale and installationof both new and used X-ray components. Questions such as the followingwere not addressed in the standard: (1) How would the standard apply to components physically produced beforethe effective date of the standard but assembled into a system after theeffective date of the standard? (2) How should the assembly of uncertified components into a system containingcertified components be controlled? (3) How should the reassembly, rebuilding, or refurbishing of used X-raycomponents or systems be controlled? (4) How should the standard be applied to preserve the radiation safetyperformance provided by certified components and systems? (5) How should the standard be applied to encourage the improvement ofexisting X-ray systems through the addition of certified components? To rectify this situation (as well as to respond to congressional concernover the regulation of used X-ray equipment), andSection; 1000.16 Assemblyand reassembly of diagnostic x-ray system was promulgated and made effectiveon the same date as the standard. In 1979, this regulation was amendedand recodified as andSection; 1020.30(p). Originally, andSection; 1000.16 provided for two phases of regulation. Thefirst phase requirements were almost exactly the same as the current requirements,i.e., certified and uncertified components could not be arbitrarily combinedinto or to form an X-ray system. Once a certified component was installedin a system, all subsequent components added to the system had to be certified.This phase was to last 5 years. The second phase imposed the much stricter requirement that only certifiedcomponents could be assembled or reassembled into a diagnostic X-ray system.Thus, any replacement component or addition to a system had to be certified,and any reassembled system had to contain only certified components. Thegradual ``upgrading'' of the first phase would have changed to a forced``upgrading'' of existing systems. An analysis of the potential effectsof the second phase (T. B. Shope and H. Rudolph, ``A Second Look at theCosts and Benefits Associated with the Diagnostic X-Ray Equipment PerformanceStandard and the Policy on Assembly and Reassembly,'' draft No. 3, unpublished,November 1978) (Ref. 6) resulted in the following conclusions: (1) The provisions of andSection; 1000.16 that would be effective after August1, 1979, would affect only a small fraction of the uncertified X-ray systemscurrently in use. (2) The total impact of this regulation, in terms of increased cost forthe X-ray equipment or interruption of health care delivery, could be significant.(3) For those uncertified systems that would be affected, by virtue oftheir sale and relocation, andSection; 1000.16 was not likely to be a cost-effectiveapproach to improve the radiation safety performance of X-ray systems.FDA proposed to revoke the post-1979 requirements on April 17, 1979 (44FR 22755). On August 24, 1979 (44 FR 49667), FDA published a final ruleon the assembly and reassembly of diagnostic X-ray systems. In the past, the principal reason for attempting to control older equipmentwas the belief that there is an economic incentive for avoiding positivebeam limitation (PBL) collimators and that avoidance would be possiblebut for andSection; 1020.30(p). However, with the change in the applicabilityof the requirement for PBL (PBL is not now required unless several majorcomponents are certified (42 FR 58167; November 8, 1977) and would no longerbe required under the proposed amendments), the economic incentive foravoidance should be less. Therefore, this reason for regulating used equipmentis no longer valid. Additional points to note are: (1) Tracing uncertified systems and components has proven to be practicallyimpossible. Thus, in essence, this section of the standard is unenforceable.(2) The standard has been in effect for nearly 14 years. Less and lessuncertified equipment is available in the used equipment market. Data froma survey of used equipment dealers (``A Study of the Need for Controllingthe Sale of Antiquated X-Ray Equipment,'' unpublished report submittedto Congress pursuant to section 357 of the Radiation Control for Healthand Safety Act, House Document 90-390, January 1, 1970) (Ref. 7), indicatedthat over 50 percent of used systems sold were less than or equal to 10years old (almost 90 percent less than 15 years). Thus, much of the problemwhich andSection; 1020.30(p) was intended to address has already been eliminateddue to obsolescence and, with the passage of a few more years, will essentiallydisappear completely. (3) The 1978 cost/benefit analysis (Ref. 6), referred to earlier, notedthat voluntary action programs aimed at maintaining a high level of performancefor uncertified systems were more cost-effective than was forced replacementof uncertified components with certified components. This is still truetoday. From the above, it is evident that andSection; 1020.30(p) is becoming lessand less applicable as the number of older systems dwindles, and they eventuallybecome obsolete. There are also voluntary programs which address the performanceof X-ray systems, i.e., general quality assurance activities using therecommendations contained in 21 CFR 1000.55; and activities involving theNationwide Evaluation of X-ray Trends (NEXT) surveys conducted by Stateand local agencies with FDA assistance. These result in performance evaluationof X-ray systems. CDRH also has regulatory authority under the Medical Device Amendmentsto the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 301 <T3>et seq</T3>.) to apply the current good manufacturing practices requirementsof 21 CFR Part 820. On December 29, 1987, FDA issued a CPG that addressesrefurbishers of medical devices, including X-ray systems (Chapter 24_Devices,Guide 7124.28, Reconditioner/ Rebuilders of Medical Devices). (See 21 CFR20.26 and 20.107.) Its aim is to assure that refurbished equipment stillmeets original manufacturer specifications or, if it does not, that itis relabeled as to the new specifications that they do meet. These approachesare much more effective than andSection; 1020.30(p) in promoting an appropriatelevel of radiation safety for used X-ray systems and components. They addressnot only uncertified, but certified systems and components also. The TEPRSSC consensus recommendation was to delete andSection; 1020.30(p)(Ref. 2). K. Linearity (andSection; 1020.31(c)) In this proposed rule, FDA is proposing to change the linearity requirementin andSection; 1020.31(c) to include X-ray equipment that provides a selectoronly for the product of tube current and time, milliamperes seconds (mAs),in place of independent selection of tube current, milliamperes (mA), andtime (seconds). The amendment would allow for testing linearity betweenadjacent mAs stations. The current requirement excludes systems that provide mAs selection only,but it is just as important for mAs-only systems to meet the linearityrequirement. Because mAs-only systems provide just the one technique factorselector for exposure output, it is important that the selector be capableof controlling the exposure in a linear manner. Thus, the proposed amendmentwould specifically include mAs-only systems. Typical technique charts provided to clinicians by the manufacturer givethe recommended mAs settings for specific examinations, and X-ray technologistsare accustomed to thinking in terms of mAs settings for a particular exposurerather than mA and time separately. Thus, it may be more meaningful torequire the system to be mAs linear.FDA has received comments from State personnel and the user community tothe effect that the linearity requirement is not stringent enough and thatit should apply over the entire range of mA stations rather than just betweenadjacent ones. Because the present requirement permits a 22 percent differencebetween adjacent stations, there could be significant deviations from linearityover the full range of tube current settings usually provided. AlthoughFDA is not now proposing this change, the agency solicits comments on thissubject. FDA also proposes not to require linearity between microfocus (nominalfocal spot size less than or equal to 0.45 mm) and larger focal spot sizes,because technologists normally do not switch between the two for a particularexamination. L. Field Limitation and Alignment for Mobile and Stationary General PurposeX-ray Systems (andSection; 1020.31(d)) FDA proposes to add the word ``portable'' to the title in andSection; 1020.31(d)and the applicability portion of the section and to revise the wordingfor the required minimum field size. Mobile X-ray systems and portableX-ray systems are treated the same throughout the regulations and are usuallyreferred to collectively as ``mobile'' systems. Sometimes, however, ``portable''and ``mobile'' are distinguished. There seems to be no consistency in referringto these systems. Even though all current performance requirements thatapply to one also apply to the other, the two types of systems are distinctlydifferent from each other and could have different requirements in thefuture. For example, a portable fluoroscope might be allowed a shortersource-to-skin distance than would a mobile system. Therefore, in the proposedamendments, the two systems are defined separately in andSection; 1020.30(b)and treated separately throughout andSection;andSection; 1020.31 and 1020.32.Manufacturers have interpreted the minimum field size requirement as meaningthat, as long as the minimum field size is no greater than an area of 5by 5 centimeters (cm), the requirement is met. This would allow, for example,a field of 1 by 25 cm. This is not the intent of the standard. The intentis that no dimension of the minimum field size shall exceed 5 cm; therefore,the wording would be revised accordingly. Similar revisions would occuragain in andSection;andSection; 1020.31(e)(2), 1020.31(g)(3), 1020.32(b) (1)and (2) for the same reason. FDA also proposes to reduce the minimum required illumination from 160lux (15 foot candles) to 100 lux (9.3 foot candles). The intent of the illumination requirement is to provide a means for visualindication of the X-ray field in a radiographic room under typical ambientconditions. This allows proper patient positioning and X-ray field sizingto the region of interest.There have been several recalls associated with the illumination requirement,affecting every major foreign manufacturer of general purpose radiographiccollimators. Bulbs burned out so fast that some assemblers purposely setlamp voltages too low, resulting in noncompliant light localizers. Theserecalls, in almost all cases, involved both a labeling/information andhardware fix (which is inherently expensive) on several thousand collimators.The 160 lux illumination limit was primarily based on technical feasibility.The ambient light levels to be expected and the radiological task to beperformed were not factored into the requirement. Observation of the visuallyindicated X-ray field is basically an edge/contrast detection process,and the interaction of the collimator light field brightness with ambientlight levels is a very important consideration. In preparation for an enforcementaction in 1982, FDA obtained data on ambient light conditions in 369 X-rayrooms across the United States. The X-ray technologist in each facilitywas asked to adjust the room light to the brightness used to perform theradiological task, i.e., ``normal'' conditions. The median value for normalroom light conditions was measured at approximately 65 lux. This numbershould be compared with the Illuminating Engineering Society recommendationof about 105 lux for X-ray rooms. Individual manufacturers and the National Electronic Manufacturer's Associationhave suggested amendments to the 160 lux illumination requirement in responseto the <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice announcing the retrospective review ofthe diagnostic X-ray standard (47 FR 51710; November 16, 1982). Their primarysuggestion was to lower the minimum illumination requirement to 100 lux.They claimed that a 100 lux requirement would extend bulb life 1000 percentwithout compromising the radiological task. The lower illumination requirementsuggestion is consistent with the International Electrotechnical Commission(IEC), which specifies 100 lux as essential and 160 lux as desirable. The XSRG (Ref. 4) concluded that: (1) Although there is only fragmentary anecdotal evidence, the 160 luxrequirement may well have resulted in higher than desirable bulb replacementrates; (2) As long as the current edge sharpness requirement is maintained, thereare no real data that indicate that lower illumination would in any waycompromise the radiological task. The somewhat unexpectedly low ambientlight levels that have been observed (approximately 65 lux) combined withthe light level recommended by the IEC reinforces the adequacy of specifying100 lux as the minimum illumination for light localizers; and (3) The 100 lux requirement would make the U.S. standard compatible withthe IEC. The TEPRSSC consensus was in agreement with FDA's proposal to change therequirement to 100 lux (Ref. 2). However, FDA continues to solicit dataregarding the adequacy of a limit of 100 lux at 1 meter for those systemswhere a larger source-image receptor distance (SID) is possible (e.g.,72 inches using a wall-mounted cassette holder). M. Field Limitation and Alignment on Stationary General Purpose X-ray Equipment(andSection; 1020.31(e)) FDA proposes to remove the requirement for PBL. Instead, the agency proposesthat PBL be optional for any radiographic system. The PBL performance requirements(currently, andSection; 1020.31(e)(2) through (6)) would be moved from thesection on field limitation and alignment on stationary general purposeX-ray equipment to a new andSection; 1020.31(g). Consequently, all currentsections beyond andSection; 1020.31(f) would be redesignated as shown inthe proposed revision of the standard. Note that all other requirementsfor field limitation and alignment on general purpose X-ray equipment wouldbe retained. The institution of PBL as a regulatory requirement has had a profound effecton the radiologic community. The cost impact is estimated by the XSRG tobe more than half the cost impact of the entire performance standard (Ref.4). The costs come from purchasing new equipment that has PBL instead ofa less expensive manual collimator and of maintaining PBL systems overthe life of the equipment. The cost impact is greatest in the low volumefacilities that do not have a large patient load. For high-volume facilities,the purchase and maintenance costs of PBL may be an even trade for moreefficient patient handling and positioning. They probably would purchasePBL even without any Federal requirement. There is evidence that the originally anticipated dose saving to be accomplishedby PBL could have been accomplished without PBL. Significant gains in achievingmore optimum beam-area-to-film-area ratios may have resulted more fromthe introduction of continuously variable rectangular collimation thanfrom PBL. Except in a few instances, the institution of continuously variablerectangular collimation leads to X-ray beam areas which generally approximatethe film area used (which is what one hopes to achieve with PBL). Also,the dose reduction benefits for PBL seem to be minimal, according to recentdata from NEXT (Ref. 2). Anecdotal evidence is also accumulating (principally from formal and informalcomments on the retrospective review) that, when PBL components fail, theyare not always repaired, especially in smaller facilities. Such facilitiesthen make do with what in essence is an expensive manual collimator, andany possible benefits of PBL are eliminated. Comments on the documents that the XSRG circulated for review to industry,States, physicists, and individuals showed mixed reactions to the proposalto eliminate the PBL requirement. The XSRG collected information and impressionsusing the Delphi method to survey the benefits of the PBL requirement,and PBL was rated highly in that evaluation process (Ref. 4). A user surveyabout PBL done in 1978 showed mixed satisfaction and dissatisfaction withPBL (Ref. 8). Mechanical and reliability problems were noted for some ofthe manufacturers' systems. Although those problems may have disappeared,continuing maintenance costs associated with PBL raise the question ofwhether the benefits are commensurate with the costs. In arriving at its recommendation to delete the requirement for PBL, theXSRG considered several alternatives such as (1) retaining PBL, (2) requiringPBL to operate only when the beam area was greater than the image receptor,(3) requiring evidence of collimation, (4) relaxing the requirements withdifferent tolerances. The XSRG recommended that FDA consider educationaland other programs to reinforce the message that collimation is importantfor radiation control. The TEPRSSC membership was divided in its opinion of the PBL amendment(Ref. 2). Members' arguments against the amendment to make PBL optionalwere: (1) The PBL requirement is necessary in order to have the feature available.The device will disappear if it is optional.(2) Certain public health issues cannot be left to the marketplace. (3) Many people who take X-rays are not fully trained radiologic technologists(RT's) or radiologists. They need PBL for proper collimation. (4) Hospitals that make their purchasing decisions based primarily on costwould not purchase PBL systems. (5) The costs presented by attending manufacturers did not compare withthe cost analysis done by the Center. (6) The suggestion of putting the effort on the States to require positiveindication of collimation is not viable. Members' arguments for making PBL optional were: (1) The Center has shown that PBL is not cost-effective. (2) The public health reason for PBL to reduce the dose, and the only casein which there was dose reduction was in chest images in nonhospital settings.Dose from chest exams is not a significant fraction of the total dose tothe population; therefore, the value of PBL is small. (3) The disappearance of PBL, if it were made optional, would mean thatsociety does not want it. (4) There is a demand on the part of users for non-PBL systems in certainapplications, and they should be given the choice. (5) Where facilities have invested a great deal of money to install PBL,it is often found to be in override or in the manual mode, in which caseit is of no benefit. (6) Because a significant percentage of the radiographs being taken todayare done on mobile systems, the focus of training ought to be shifted tomanual collimation with a deemphasis on PBL systems. The deletion of the requirement for PBL would constitute a significantchange in the standard. Therefore, FDA specifically solicits comments onthis issue. FDA also asks for comments on whether other collimation systems,such as the World Health Organization's Basic Radiological System (whichuses color coded fixed apertures) should be allowed. N. Field Limitation and Alignment for Spot-Film Devices (andSection; 1020.31(g))In andSection; 1020.31, FDA proposes to redesignate paragraph (g) as paragraph(h) and to revise it, including changing the word ``film'' to ``image receptor''.The term ``image receptor,'' as defined, includes film. ``Image receptor''is used throughout the X-ray performance standard and again in this sectioneven though the word ``film'' is also used. The proposed amendment providesfor consistency of terms by using ``image receptor'' throughout. FDA also proposes to change the limits on edge misalignment of the X-rayfield and image receptor to a size comparison of X-ray field and imagereceptor. As currently expressed, the requirement creates a difficult testprocedure. Further, this requirement is not compatible with other radiographicfield limitation and alignment requirements contained in the standard.The difficulty in testing arises from the need to reconstruct the entireX-ray field at the spot-film plane and to compare it to the edges of theselected portion of the spot film. Because a direct test of the spot-filmrequirement is so difficult to perform in the field, indirect tests aremade by FDA when determining compliance at users' facilities. There are only two arguments against this change, both of which FDA considersto be of minor concern. First, the comparison of edges requirement imposesa requirement on the orientation of the X-ray field with respect to theselected portion of the film. However, large rotations of the  X-ray fieldwith respect to the selected portion of the film are very improbable and,in addition, would be unacceptable to the radiologist because of unexposedportions of the film. On the other hand, small rotations which would betolerated by the radiologist would not have a significant impact on radiationexposure to the patient. The second argument is that if both the size of the X-ray field and thecenters misalignment happen to be at the tolerances permitted by the proposedamendment, then the maximum permitted unnecessary exposure to the patientwould be larger than now exists. This, however, assumes worst-case conditionsfor both the X-ray field size as well as for the centers misalignment,and the likelihood of this is small. Thus, the present and proposed requirementswould be essentially identical with respect to the control of unnecessaryexposure to the patient. FDA also proposes to redesignate andSection; 1020.31(g)(3) as andSection; 1020.31(h)(4)and to revise it to incorporate information in FDA CPG 7133.17, dated October1, 1980, for fixed-SID fluoroscopic systems that do not provide steplessadjustment of the X-ray field. (See 21 CFR 20.26 and 20.107. The current requirement for the minimum X-ray field size for nonsteplessbeam limitation during spot-filming is different from the minimum  X-rayfield size during fluoroscopy, yet the same beam limiting device may beused in both applications. This complicates the beam limitation designbecause different diaphragms may be needed to meet the minimum requirementfor each mode of operation. In a memorandum to all diagnostic X-ray equipmentmanufacturers and assemblers dated October 22, 1980 (Ref. 9), FDA statedthat the 5 by 5 centimeter (cm) minimum field size requirement for spot-filmdevices would not be enforced for nonstepless beam limiting devices, butthat such devices would be required to provide a minimum X-ray field sizeof 125 square centimeters or less. This makes the requirement consistentwith the fluoroscopic field limitation requirements in andSection; 1020.32(b)(2)(iv).FDA proposes to incorporate this requirement into the standard. TEPRSSC was in agreement with the changes to andSection; 1020.31(g) (Ref.2). O. Standby Radiation From Capacitor Energy Storage Equipment (andSection;1020.31(k)) FDA proposes to redesignate andSection; 1020.31(k) as andSection; 1020.31(l);to revise the paragraph heading to read, ``Radiation from capacitor energystorage equipment''; to revise the text of this paragraph to change theexposure limit format for standby radiation; and to incorporate the exposurelimit for discharge radiation. The standby radiation from capacitor energy storage systems is not alwaysemitted at a constant amplitude but may occasionally have large short durationspikes which can be measured by radiation instruments having very shortresponse times. If one were using such an instrument to measure for onlya short time and happened to encounter one of these spikes, the measurementwould be highly biased, making the overall exposure rate appear much higherthan it really is. An instrument with a longer response time would tendto average the exposure rate, giving a more reasonable assessment of theoverall rate. Currently, andSection; 1020.31(k) specifies the acceptable range for instrumentresponse times for measurement of standby radiation. Unfortunately, responsetime is an unwieldy concept that is often confusing and, as specified inandSection; 1020.31(k), does not cover all radiation instruments that mightbe used in quality assurance programs. In fact, the instrument now beingused by FDA for compliance testing technically does not meet the responsetime requirement. The proposed amendment changes the requirement from exposure rate to exposureexpressed over a reasonable time interval that allows for ``smoothing''of the exposure profile and, at the same time, obviates the need for specifyingthe instrument response time.The current standby radiation requirement was written using the worst-caseassumptions that the unit was continually on standby (i.e., charged up)and that the user was in close proximity to the unit. The two milliroentgen(mR)-per-hour-at-5-cm limit ensures that the 40-hour week occupationalexposure limit of 100 mR is not exceeded. In many capacitor discharge X-raysystems, however, radiation may also be emitted under the following situations:(1) The kilovoltage is initially set too high for the radiological procedureand is lowered by discharging through the X-ray tube; (2) The radiological procedure is completed and the unit is manually discharged(``discharge pushbutton'') through the X-ray tube before or after deactivatingthe input power; or (3) The radiological procedure is completed and the unit automaticallydischarges through the X-ray tube upon deactivating the input power. Thesecircumstances do not involve the exposure switch or timer and, therefore,fall within the description of standby radiation in andSection; 1020.30(k).However, the worst-case assumptions of the standby requirements are notappropriate for the discharge situations described above. First, one cannotmake the assumption that the unit is continually being discharged; secondly,the user will not be in close proximity to the radiation source duringdischarge, certainly not at 5 cm. An exposure rate limit of 2 mR per hourat 5 cm is unduly restrictive for these situations. Recognizing this, FDAissued a multiple address letter (BRH:DOC:MA 355) (Ref. 10) to all manufacturersand established a different exposure limit for when the system was beingdischarged via a discharge button or by deactivation of power. The proposed amendment would revise the paragraph heading, eliminatingthe word ``standby.'' Standby radiation (although not defined in andSection;1020.30(b)) was intended, for purposes of andSection; 1020.31(k), to be onlythat radiation that was emitted from the source while the system was ina charged state awaiting an exposure activation. The radiation producedvia the discharge button does not fit within that intent. Neither doesit fit within the definition of leakage radiation, even though the proposedexposure limits are identical. Thus andSection; 1020.30(k) is inapplicableas well. Therefore, the ``discharge'' radiation limits that would be codified inthe proposed amendment to andSection; 1020.31(k), are chosen in order tobe consistent with the leakage requirements in existing andSection; 1020.30(k),which originally derived from the recommendations of the NCRP (Ref. 11).The word ``standby'' would be eliminated from the title since both standbyand discharge radiation are addressed in this section. TEPRSSC was in agreement with the proposed changes to andSection; 1020.31(k)(Ref. 2). P. Image Intensified Fluoroscopy (Further Limitation of the Field (andSection;1020.32(b)(2)(iv)) FDA proposes to revise the first two sentences of andSection; 1020.32(b)(2)(iv)to add the phrase, ``the capability of,'' preceding the phrase, ``a visiblearea.''The current wording of the requirement has been interpreted by some manufacturersto mean that, if the collimator can be adjusted so that the system doesnot produce a visible area of greater than 300 square cm, it does not needstepless adjustment collimation. The intent of the performance standard,however, is that systems designed with the capability to produce a visiblearea of greater than 300 square cm by ordinary opening of the collimator,regardless of whether or not the collimator happens to be opened that large,shall provide stepless adjustment collimation. TEPRSSC agreed with theproposed change (Ref. 2). Q. Entrance Exposure Rate Limits (andSection; 1020.32(d))  FDA proposes to insert a new paragraph to be codified as andSection; 1020.32(d)(3)for fluoroscopic systems having both an automatic and a manual mode. Section 1020.32(d) specifies the entrance exposure rate (EER) limits forsystems which have only an automatic mode or a manual mode, but it doesnot specify the EER limits for systems capable of both manual and automaticoperation. A number of manufacturers make such combination systems, andFDA has received many questions regarding allowable EER limits for suchsystems. In response, FDA issued a multiple address letter (BRH:DOC:MA1189, dated March 26, 1974) to all manufacturers which set forth the policythat FDA follows in enforcing andSection; 1020.32(d) for combination systems(Ref. 12). The policy introduced a new EER limit which is not found inexisting andSection; 1020.32(d), namely an allowance of 10 roentgens perminute (R/min) for the manual mode if that mode does not have a high levelcontrol. The proposed amendment adds the provisions of the policy to thestandard and distinguishes combination systems from automatic-only andmanual-only systems. FDA proposes (1) to make clear that the requirements of andSection; 1020.32(d)(4)(iii)apply to all C-arm systems; (2) to specify the measurement geometry moreclearly for variable (source-image receptor distance) SID systems; and(3) to incorporate the requirements of the FDA multiple-address letter(MA:OC:DRP 387, dated March 24, 1986) for measurement of EER of C-arm fluoroscopes(Ref. 13) into a new paragraph. When this section was originally written, the only C-arm systems availablewere mobile with a fixed SID. In recent years, manufacturers have produceda variety of C-arm systems that are much more sophisticated than the simplemobile fixed-SID types. These include large stationary systems with variableSID, tables, and radiographic as well as fluoroscopic capability. Although andSection; 1020.32(d)(4)(iii) does not specifically exclude thelarger systems, manufacturers have interpreted it to apply only to mobilesystems with fixed SID's. For the larger stationary C-arm systems, somemanufacturers have taken the position that andSection; 1020.32(d)(4)(iii)does not apply but rather that andSection; 1020.32(d)(4)(i) or (ii) doesapply because those manufacturers' systems were equipped with a table.Other manufacturers, admitting that their large stationary systems wereC-arm fluoroscopes, have interpreted andSection; 1020.32(d)(4)(iii) to meanthat they could measure the EER at the maximum SID. This means that theEER limits could be exceeded at the 30 cm measurement point when the systemis adjusted to shorter SID's. This, of course, was not the intent of andSection;1020.32(d)(4)(iii). FDA also proposes to add a new paragraph to provide the measurement geometryfor lateral fluoroscopes. The present performance standard does not statethe measurement geometry for the EER of lateral fluoroscopes. These systemsare usually configured such that the X-ray beam is directed across thetable and the source is neither below nor above. Thus, andSection; 1020.32(d)(4)(i) and (ii) do not apply. FDA issued a multiple-address letter (BRH:DOC:MA335, dated August 29, 1977) describing the measurement geometry for lateralfluoroscopes (Ref. 14). The proposed amendment adds the requirements statedin the letter to andSection; 1020.32(d). TEPRSSC agreed with the proposedamendment (Ref. 2). R. Change in Units Throughout the Standard In accordance with current agency policy, under this proposal, all unitsfor quantities in andSection;andSection; 1020.30, 1020.31, and 1020.32 wouldbe changed to units of the International System of Units (SI units). Thiswould result, for example, in the use of coulomb/kilogram as the unit ofexposure in place of the unit roentgen, as previously used, and in changingvalues expressed in centimeters to values expressed in millimeters or meters.No changes in requirements result from the changes to SI Units.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 </ITAG>Section 1020.30(g) <T3>Information to be provided to assemblers </T3>contains relief frominformation collection requirements in that certain replacement assembliesand components are exempted from reporting and recordkeeping requirements.There are no other changes in information collection requirements. Allinformation collection and recordkeeping requirements for this performancestandard have been approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB)under control number 0910-0213 ``Reporting and Recordkeeping for ElectronicProducts under Public Law 90-602_Specific Product Requirements'' and arein conformance with section 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980as interpreted by OMB in 5 CFR part 1320. (See 49 FR 13666; March 31, 1983.)Other organizations and individuals desiring to submit comments on thecollection of information requirements should direct them to FDA's DocketsManagement Branch (address above) and to the Office of Information andRegulatory Affairs, OMB, Rm. 3208, New Executive Office Bldg., Washington,DC 20503, ATTN: Desk Officer for FDA. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. References </ITAG>The following information has been placed on display in the Dockets ManagementBranch (address above) and may be seen by interested persons from 9 a.m.to 4 p.m., Monday through Friday.<ITAG tagnum="21">1. Agenda and Background Information, 21st Meeting, Technical ElectronicProduct Radiation Safety Standards Committee, June 22 and 23, 1987, Centerfor Devices and Radiological Health. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Center for Devices and Radiological Health, 21st Meeting of theTechnical Electronic Product Radiation Safety Standards Committee, transcript.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. ``An Overview of the Costs and Benefits of the Diagnostic X-RayEquipment Performance Standard (21 CFR 1020.30-32),'' NTIS, PB85-115947,August, 1984. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. ``Retrospective Review of the Performance Standard for DiagnosticX-Ray Systems and Other Major Components (21 CFR 1020.30-32),'' July, 1985.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Health Industry Manufacturers Association Report, ``Applicationof 21 CFR 1020.30(n) Performance Standards for Diagnostic X-Ray SystemTabletops to Mobile Stretchers,'' submitted to FDA, December 10, 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. T.B. Shope and H. Rudolph, ``A Second Look at the Costs and BenefitsAssociated with the Diagnostic X-Ray Equipment Performance Standard andthe Policy on Assembly and Reassembly,'' draft No. 3, unpublished, November1978. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. ``A Study of the Need for Controlling the Sale of Antiquated X-RayEquipment,'' unpublished report submitted to Congress pursuant to section357 of the Radiation Control for Health and Safety Act, House Document90-390, January 1, 1970. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, ``Positive Beam LimitationEffectiveness Evaluation,'' HHS Publication (FDA) 80-8108. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Multiple address letter (MAH: BRH: DOC XPB 354, dated October 22,1980), ``Minimum X-Ray Field Size for Spot Film Operation of FluoroscopicSystems with Fixed SID.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Multiple address letter (BRH: DOC: MA 355, dated September 18,1980), ``Standby Radiation from Capacitor Energy Storage Equipment,'' (21CFR 1020.31(k)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. National Council on Radiation Protection Report, No. 33, ``MedicalX-Ray and Gamma-Ray Protection for Energies up to 10 MeV_Equipment Designand Use,'' February 1, 1968. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Multiple address letter (BRH: DOC: MA 1189, dated March 26, 1974),``Entrance Exposure Rate Determination for Fluoroscopic Systems.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">13. FDA multiple-address letter (MA: OC: DRP 387, dated March 24,1986), ``Measurement of EER of C-Arm Fluoroscopic X-Ray Systems.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">14. FDA multiple-address letter (BRH: DOC: MA 335, dated August 29,1977), ``Measurement of Entrance Exposure Rate for Lateral Type Fluoroscopes_21CFR 1020.32(d).'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">V. Economic Impact </ITAG>This proposed rule is the result of an extensive retrospective review,including a cost-benefit analysis of regulatory impact, meeting the requirementsof Executive Order 12291, as defined in the Regulatory Flexibility Act(Pub. L. 96-354). The agency concludes that the proposed rule is not amajor rule as defined in Executive Order 12291. Further, the agency certifiesthat the proposed rule, if implemented, will not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities, as defined in the RegulatoryFlexibility Act. Copies of the documents supporting this determination(``An Overview of the Costs and Benefits of the Diagnostic X-Ray EquipmentPerformance Standard (21 CFR 1020.30-32)'' and ``Retrospective Review ofthe Performance Standard for Diagnostic X-Ray Systems and Their Major Components'')are on file in the Dockets Management Branch and may be seen in that officebetween 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Comments </ITAG>Interested persons may, on or before January 16, 1990, submit to the DocketsManagement Branch (address above) written comments regarding this proposal.Two copies of any comments are to be submitted, except that individualsmay submit one copy. Comments are to be identified with the docket numberfound in brackets in the heading of this document. Received comments maybe seen in the office above between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 21 CFR Part 1020 </ITAG>Diagnostic X-ray systems, Electronic products, Medical devices, Radiationprotection, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Television, X-rays.Therefore, under the Public Health Service Act as amended by the RadiationControl for Health and Safety Act of 1968 and under authority delegatedto the Commissioner of Food and Drugs, it is proposed that 21 CFR part1020 be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 1020_PERFORMANCE STANDARDS FOR IONIZING RADIATION EMITTING PRODUCTS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 1020 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 501, 502, 515-520, 701, 801 of the Federal Food,Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 351, 352, 360e-360j, 371, 381); secs.354-360F of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 263b-263n).</ITAG>2. Sections 1020.30, 1020.31, and 1020.32 are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1020.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Diagnostic X-ray systems and their major components. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicability.</T3> (1) The provisions of this section are applicableto: (i) The following components of diagnostic X-ray systems: (A) Tube housing assemblies, X-ray controls, X-ray high-voltage generators,X-ray tables, cradles, film changers, vertical cassette holders mountedin a fixed location and cassette holders with front panels, and beam-limitingdevices manufactured after August 1, 1974. (B) Fluoroscopic imaging assemblies manufactured after August 1, 1974,and before April 26, 1977. (C) Spot-film devices and image intensifiers manufactured after April 26,1977. (D) Cephalometric devices manufactured after February 25, 1978. (E) Image receptor support devices for mammographic X-ray systems manufacturedafter September 5, 1978. (ii) Diagnostic X-ray systems, except computed tomography X-ray systems,incorporating one or more of such components; however, such X-ray systemsshall be required to comply only with those provisions of this sectionand andSection;andSection; 1020.31 and 1020.32 which relate to the componentscertified in accordance with paragraph (c) of this section and installedinto the systems. (iii) Computed tomography (CT) X-ray systems manufactured before November29, 1984. (iv) CT gantries manufactured after September 3, 1985. (2) The following provisions of this section and andSection; 1020.33 areapplicable to computed tomography X-ray systems manufactured or remanufacturedafter November 29, 1984: (i) Section 1020.30(a); (ii) Section 1020.30(b) ``Technique factors''; (iii) Section 1020.30(b) ``Computed tomography (CT),'' ``Scan,'' ``Scantime,'' ``Tomogram,'' and ``Dose''; (iv) Section 1020.30(h)(3) (vi) through (viii); (v) Section 1020.30(n); (vi) Section 1020.33 (a) and (b); (vii) Section 1020.33(c)(1) as it affects andSection; 1020.33(c)(2); and(viii) Section 1020.33(c)(2). (3) The provisions of this section and andSection; 1020.33 in its entirety,including those provisions in paragraph (a)(2) of this section, are applicableto computed tomography X-ray systems manufactured or remanufactured afterSeptember 3, 1985. The date of manufacture of the CT system is the dateof manufacture of the CT gantry. (b) <T3>Definitions.</T3> As used in this section and andSection;andSection; 1020.31,1020.32, and 1020.33, the following definitions apply: <T3>Accessible surface</T3> means the external surface of the enclosureor housing provided by the manufacturer. <T3>Accessory component</T3> means: (1) A component used with diagnostic X-ray systems, such as a cradle orfilm changer, that is not necessary for the compliance of the system withapplicable provisions of this subchapter but which requires an initialdetermination of compatibility with the system; or (2) A component necessary for compliance of the system with applicableprovisions of this subchapter but which may be interchanged with similarcompatible components without affecting the system's compliance, such asone of a set of interchangeable beam-limiting devices; or (3) A component compatible with all X-ray systems with which it may beused and that does not require compatibility or installation instructions,such as a tabletop cassette holder. <T3>Aluminum equivalent</T3> means the thickness of aluminum (type 1100alloy)\1\<NOTE/> affording the same attenuation, under specified conditionsas the material in question. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The nominal chemical composition of type 1100 aluminumalloy is 99.00 percent minimum aluminum, 0.12 percent copper, as givenin ``Aluminum Standards and Data'' (1969). Copies may be obtained from:The Aluminum Association, New York, NY.<T3>Articulated joint</T3> means a joint between two separate sectionsof a tabletop which joint provides the capacity for one of the sectionsto pivot on the line segment joining the sections. <T3>Assembler</T3> means any person engaged in the business of assembling,replacing, or installing one or more components into a diagnostic X-raysystem or subsystem. The term includes the owner of an X-ray system orhis or her employee or agent who assembles components into an X-ray systemthat is subsequently used to provide professional or commercial services.<T3>Attenuation block</T3> means a block or stack of type 1100 aluminumalloy or aluminum alloy having equivalent attenuation with dimensions 200millimeters by 200 millimeters by 38 millimeters. <T3>Automatic exposure control</T3> means a device which automaticallycontrols one or more technique factors in order to obtain at a preselectedlocation(s) a required quantity of radiation.<T3>Beam axis </T3>means a line from the source through the centers ofthe X-ray fields.<T3>Beam-limiting device </T3>means a device which provides a means torestrict the dimensions of the X-ray field.<T3>Cantilevered tabletop </T3>means a tabletop designed such that theunsupported portion can be extended at least 1 meter beyond the support.<T3>Cassette holder </T3>means a device, other than a spot-film device,that supports and/or fixes the position of an X-ray film cassette duringan X-ray exposure. <T3>Cephalometric device </T3>means a device intended for the radiographicvisualization and measurement of the dimensions of the human head. <T3>Coefficient of variation </T3>means the ratio of the standard deviationto the mean value of a population of observations. It is estimated usingthe following equation:<G/><ITAG tagnum="91"> insert illus. 201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="92"/><ITAG tagnum="26">where</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">s=Estimated standard deviation of the population. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XandCx.174;8=Mean value of observations in sample. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Xi=ith observation sampled. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">n=Number of observations sampled.</ITAG><T3>Computed tomography (CT)</T3> means the production of a tomogram bythe acquisition and computer processing of X-ray transmission data. <T3>Control panel</T3> means that part of the X-ray control upon whichare mounted the switches, knobs, pushbuttons, and other hardware necessaryfor manually setting the technique factors. <T3>Cooling curve</T3> means the graphical relationship between heat unitsstored and cooling time. <T3>Cradle</T3> means: (1) A removable device which supports and may restrain a patient abovean X-ray table; or (2) A device; (i) Whose patient support structure is interposed between the patient andthe image receptor during normal use; (ii) Which is equipped with means for patient restraint; and (iii) Which is capable of rotation about its long (longitudinal) axis.<T3>CT gantry</T3> means tube housing assemblies, beam-limiting devices,detectors, and the supporting structures, frames, and covers which holdand/or enclose these components. <T3>Diagnostic source assembly</T3> means the tube housing assembly witha beam-limiting device attached. <T3>Diagnostic X-ray system</T3> means an X-ray system designed for irradiationof any part of the human body for the purpose of diagnosis or visualization.<T3>Dose</T3> means the absorbed dose as defined by the International Commissionon Radiation Units and Measurements. The absorbed dose, D, is the quotientof de by dm, where de is the mean energy imparted by ionizing radiationto matter of mass dm. <T3>Equipment</T3> means X-ray equipment. <T3>Exposure</T3> means the quotient of dQ by dm where dQ is the absolutevalue of the total charge of the ions of one sign produced in air whenall the electrons (negatrons and positrons) liberated by photons in a volumeelement of air having mass dm are completely stopped in air. <T3>Field emission equipment</T3> means equipment which uses an X-ray tubein which electron emission from the cathode is due solely to the actionof an electric field. <T3>Fluoroscopic imaging assembly</T3> means a subsystem in which X-rayphotons produce a fluoroscopic image. It includes the image receptor(s)such as the image intensifier and spot-film device, electrical interlocks,if any, and structural material providing linkage between the image receptorand diagnostic source assembly. <T3>General purpose radiographic X-ray system</T3> means any radiographicX-ray system which, by design, is not limited to radiographic examinationof specific anatomical regions.<T3>Half-value layer (HVL) </T3>means the thickness of specified materialwhich attenuates the beam of radiation to an extent such that the exposurerate is reduced to one-half of its original value. In this definition thecontribution of all scattered radiation, other than any which might bepresent initially in the beam concerned, is deemed to be excluded. <T3>Image intensifier </T3>means a device, installed in its housing, whichinstantaneously converts an X-ray pattern into a corresponding light imageof higher energy density. <T3>Image receptor </T3>means any device, such as a fluorescent screen,radiographic film, solid-state detector, or gaseous detector, which transformsincident X-ray photons either into a visible image or into another formwhich can be made into a visible image by further transformations. In thosecases where means are provided to preselect portions of the image receptor,the term ``image receptor'' shall mean the preselected portion of the device.<T3>Image receptor support </T3>means, for mammographic systems, that partof the system designed to support the image receptor in a horizontal planeduring a mammographic examination. <T3>Leakage radiation </T3>means radiation emanating from the diagnosticsource assembly except for: the useful beam; and radiation produced whenthe exposure switch or timer is not activated. <T3>Leakage technique factors </T3>means the technique factors associatedwith the diagnostic source assembly which are used in measuring leakageradiation. They are defined as follows: for diagnostic source assembliesintended for capacitor energy storage equipment, the maximum-rated peaktube potential and the maximum-rated number of exposures in an hour foroperation at the maximum-rated peak tube potential with the quantity ofcharge per exposure being 10 millicoulombs or the minimum obtainable fromthe unit, whichever is larger; for diagnostic source assemblies intendedfor field emission equipment rated for pulsed operation, the maximum-ratedpeak tube potential and the maximum-rated number of X-ray pulses in anhour for operation at the maximum-rated peak tube potential; and for allother diagnostic source assemblies, the maximum-rated peak tube potentialand the maximum-rated continuous tube current for the maximum-rated peaktube potential. <T3>Light field </T3>means that area of the intersection of the light beamfrom the beam-limiting device and one of the set of planes parallel toand including the plane of the image receptor, whose perimeter is the locusof points at which the illuminance is one-fourth of the maximum in theintersection. <T3>Line-voltage regulation </T3>means the difference between the no-loadand the load line potentials expressed as a percent of the load line potential;that is<ITAG tagnum="20">Percent line-voltage regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,i1,13 </C>  <H1>100 (Vn^Vi) </H1><H2>Vi</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="20">where</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Vn=No-load line potential and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Vi=Load line potential.</ITAG><T3>Maximum line current </T3>means the root mean square current in thesupply line of an X-ray machine operating at its maximum rating.  <T3>Moveable tabletop </T3>means a tabletop which, when assembled for use,is capable of movement with respect to its supportlng structure withinthe plane of the tabletop. <T3>Peak tube potential </T3>means the maximum value of the potential differenceacross the X-ray tube during an exposure. <T3>Primary protective barrier </T3>means the material, excluding filters,placed in the useful beam to reduce the radiation exposure for protectionpurposes. <T3>Quick change X-ray tube </T3>means an X-ray tube designed for use inits associated tube housing such that: (1) The tube cannot be inserted in its housing in a manner that would resultin noncompliance of the system with the requirements of paragraphs (k)and (m) of this section; and (2) The focal spot position will not cause noncompliance with the provisionsof this section or andSection; 1020.31 or andSection; 1020.32; and (3) The shielding within the tube housing cannot be displaced; and (4) Any removal and subsequent replacement of a beam-limiting device duringreloading of the tube in the tube housing will not result in noncomplianceof the X-ray system with the applicable field limitation and alignmentrequirements of andSection; andSection; 1020.31 and 1020.32. <T3>Radiation therapy simulation system </T3>means a radiographic or fluoroscopicX-ray system intended for localizing the volume to be exposed during radiationtherapy and confirming the position and size of the therapeutic irradiationfield. <T3>Rated line voltage </T3>means the range of potentials, in volts, ofthe supply line specified by the manufacturer at which the X-ray machineis designed to operate. <T3>Rated output current </T3>means the maximum allowable load currentof the X-ray high-voltage generator. <T3>Rated output voltage </T3>means the allowable peak potential, in volts,at the output terminals of the X-ray high-voltage generator. <T3>Rating </T3>means the operating limits specified by the manufacturer.<T3>Recording </T3>means producing a permanent form of an image resultingfrom X-ray photons (e.g., film, video tape). <T3>Scan </T3>means the complete process of collecting X-ray transmissiondata for the production of a tomogram. Data may be collected simultaneouslyduring a single scan for the production of one or more tomograms. <T3>Scan time </T3>means the period of time between the beginning and endof X-ray transmission data accumulation tor a single scan.<T3>Source</T3> means the focal spot of the X-ray tube. <T3>Source-image receptor distance (SlD)</T3> means the distance from thesource to the center of the input surface of the image receptor.  <T3>Spot-film device</T3> means a device intended to transport and/or positiona radiographic image receptor between the X-ray source and fluoroscopicimage receptor. It includes a device intended to hold a cassette over theinput end of an image intensifier for the purpose of making a radiograph.<T3>Stationary tabletop</T3> means a tabletop which, when assembled foruse, is incapable of movement with respect to its supporting structurewithin the plane of the tabletop. <T3>Technique factors</T3> means the following conditions of operation:for capacitor energy storage equipment, peak tube potential in kilovolts(kV) and quantity of charge in milliamperes seconds (mAs); for field emissionequipment rated for pulsed operation, peak tube potential in kV and numberof X-ray pulses; for CT equipment designed for pulsed operation, peak tubepotential in kV, scan time in seconds, and either tube current in milliamperes(mA), X-ray pulse width in seconds, and the number of X-ray pulses perscan, or the product of tube current, X-ray pulse width, and the numberof X-ray pulses in mAs; for CT equipment not designed for pulsed operation,peak tube potential in kV, and either tube current in mA and scan timein seconds, or the product of tube current and exposure time in mAs andthe scan time when the scan time and exposure time are equivalent; andfor all other equipment, peak tube potential in kV, and either tube currentin mA and exposure time in seconds, or the product of tube current andexposure time in mAs.  <T3>Tomogram</T3> means the depiction of the X-ray attenuation propertiesof a section through a body. <T3>Tube</T3> means an X-ray tube, unless otherwise specified. <T3>Tube housing assembly</T3> means the tube housing with tube installed.It includes high-voltage and/or filament transformers and other appropriateelements when they are contained within the tube housing. <T3>Tube rating chart</T3> means the set of curves which specify the ratedlimits of operation of the tube in terms of the technique factors. <T3>Useful beam</T3> means the radiation which passes through the tubehousing port and the aperture of the beam-limiting device when the exposureswitch or timer is activated. <T3>Variable-aperture beam-limiting device</T3> means a beam-limiting devicewhich has capacity for stepless adjustment of the X-ray field size at agiven SID. <T3>Visible area</T3> means the portion of the input surface of the imagereceptor over which incident X-ray photons are producing a visible image.<T3>X-ray control</T3> means a device which controls input power to theX-ray high-voltage generator and/or the X-ray tube. It includes equipmentsuch as timers, phototimers, automatic brightness stabilizers, and similardevices, which control the technique factors of an X-ray exposure. <T3>X-ray equipment</T3> means an X-ray system, subsystem, or componentthereof. Types of X-ray equipment are as follows: ``mobile X-ray equipment''means X-ray equipment mounted on a permanent base with wheels and/or castersfor moving while completely assembled; ``portable X-ray equipment'' meansX-ray equipment designed to be hand-carried; and ``stationary X-ray equipment''means X-ray equipment which is installed in a fixed location. <T3>X-ray field</T3> means that area of the intersection of the usefulbeam and any one of the set of planes parallel to and including the planeof the image receptor, whose perimeter is the locus of points at whichthe exposure rate is one-fourth of the maximum in the intersection. <T3>X-ray high-voltage generator</T3> means a device which transforms electricalenergy from the potential supplied by the X-ray control to the tube operatingpotential. The device may also include means for transforming alternatingcurrent to direct current, filament transformers for the X-ray tube(s),high-voltage switches, electrical protective devices, and other appropriateelements. <T3>X-ray system</T3> means an assemblage of components for the controlledproduction of X-rays. It includes minimally an X-ray high-voltage generator,an X-ray control, a tube housing assembly, a beam-limiting device, andthe necessary supporting structures. Additional components which functionwith the system are considered integral parts of the system. <T3>X-ray subsystem</T3> means any combination of two or more componentsof an X-ray system for which there are requirements specified in this sectionand andSection;andSection; 1020.31 and 1020.32. <T3>X-ray table</T3> means a patient support device with its patient supportstructure (tabletop) interposed between the patient and the image receptorduring radiography and/or fluoroscopy. This includes, but is not limitedto, any stretcher equipped with a radiolucent panel and any table equippedwith a cassette tray (or bucky), cassette tunnel, image intensifier, orspot-film device beneath the tabletop. <T3>X-ray tube</T3> means any electron tube which is designed for the conversionof electrical energy into X-ray energy. (c) <T3>Manufacturer's responsibility. </T3>Manufacturers of products subjectto andSection;andSection; 1020.30 through 1020.33 shall certify that each oftheir products meet all applicable requirements when installed into a diagnosticX-ray system according to instructions. This certification shall be madeunder the format specified in andSection; 1010.2 of this chapter. Manufacturersmay certify a combination of two or more components if they obtain priorauthorization in writing from the Director of the Office of Complianceand Surveillance of the Center for Devices and Radiological Health. Manufacturersshall not be held responsible for noncompliance of their products if thatnoncompliance is due solely to the improper installation or assembly ofthat product by another person; however, manufacturers are responsiblefor providing assembly instructions adequate to assure compliance of theircomponents with the applicable provisions of andSection;andSection; 1020.30through 1020.33. (d) <T3>Assemblers' responsibility. </T3>An assembler who installs one or morecomponents certified as required by paragraph (c) of this section shallinstall certified components that are of the type required by andSection;andSection;1020.31, 1020.32, or 1020.33 and shall assemble, install, adjust, and testthe certified components according to the instructions of their respectivemanufacturers. Assemblers shall not be liable for noncompliance of a certifiedcomponent if the assembly of that component was according to the componentmanufacturer's instruction. (1) <T3>Reports of assembly. </T3>All assemblers who install certified componentsshall file a report of assembly, except as specified in paragraph (d)(2)of this section. The report will be construed as the assembler's certificationand identification under andSection;andSection; 1010.2 and 1010.3 of this chapter.The assembler shall affirm in the report that the manufacturer's instructionswere followed in the assembly or that the certified components as assembledinto the system meet all applicable requirements of andSection;andSection;1020.30 through 1020.33. All assembler reports must be on a form prescribedby and available from the Director, Center for Devices and RadiologicalHealth, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857. Completed reports mustbe submitted to the Director, the purchaser, and, where applicable, tothe State agency responsible for radiation protection within 15 days followingcompletion of the assembly. (2) <T3>Exceptions to reporting requirements. </T3>Reports of assembly neednot be submitted for: (i) Reloaded or replacement tube housing assemblies which are reinstalledor newly assembled into an existing X-ray system; or (ii) Certified accessory components which have been identified as suchto the Center for Devices and Radiological Health in the report requiredunder andSection; 1002.10 of this chapter. (e) <T3>Identification of X-ray components. </T3>In addition to the identificationrequirements specified in andSection; 1010.3 of this chapter, manufacturersof components subject to this section and andSection;andSection; 1020.31, 1020.32,and 1020.33, except high-voltage generators contained within tube housingsand beam-limiting devices which are integral parts of tube housings, shallpermanently inscribe or affix thereon the model number and serial numberof the product, so as to be legible and accessible to view. The word ``model''or ``type'' shall appear as part of the manufacturer's required identificationof certified X-ray components. Where the certification of a system or subsystem,consisting of two or more components, has been authorized pursuant to paragraph(c) of this section, a single inscription, tag, or label bearing such informationmay be used to identify the product.(1) <T3>Tube housing assemblies.</T3> In a similar manner, manufacturers oftube housing assemblies shall also inscribe or affix thereon the name ofthe manufacturer, model number, and serial number of the X-ray tube whichthe tube housing assembly incorporates. (2) <T3>Replacement of tubes.</T3> Except as specified in paragraph (e)(3)of this section, the replacement of an X-ray tube in a previously manufacturedtube-housing assembly certified pursuant to paragraph (c) of this sectionconstitutes manufacture of a new tube housing assembly, and the manufactureris subject to the provisions of paragraph (e)(1) of this section. The manufacturershall remove, cover, or deface any previously affixed inscriptions, tags,or labels, that are no longer applicable. (3) <T3>Quick-change X-ray tubes.</T3> The requirements of paragraph (e)(2)of this section shall not apply to tube-housing assemblies designed anddesignated by original manufacturer to contain quick change X-ray tubes.The manufacturer of such X-ray tubes shall include with each replacementtube a label with the tube manufacturer's name, the model, and serial numberof the X-ray tube. The manufacturer of the tube shall instruct the assemblerwho installs the new tube to attach the label to the tube-housing assemblyand to remove the cover or deface the previously affixed inscriptions,tags, or labels that are described by the tube manufacturer as no longerapplicable.  (f) [Reserved] (g) <T3>Information to be provided to assemblers.</T3> Manufacturers of componentslisted in paragraph (a)(1) of this section shall provide to assemblerssubject to paragraph (d) of this section and, upon request, to others ata cost not to exceed the cost of publication and distribution, instructionsfor assembly, installation, adjustment, and testing of such componentsadequate to assure that the products will comply with applicable provisionsof this section and andSection;andSection; 1020.31, 1020.32, and 1020.33, whenassembled, installed, adjusted, and tested as directed. Such instructionsshall include specifications of other components compatible with that tobe installed when compliance of the system or subsystem depends on theircompatibility. Such specifications may describe pertinent physical characteristicsof the components and/or may list by manufacturer model number the componentswhich are compatible. For X-ray controls and generators, manufacturersshall provide: (1) A statement of the rated line voltage and the range line-voltage regulationfor operation at maximum line current; (2) A statement of the maximum line current of the X-ray system based onthe maximum input voltage and current characteristics of the tube housingassembly compatible with rated output voltage and rated output currentcharacteristics of the X-ray control and associated hlgh-voltage generator.If the rated input voltage and current characteristics of the tube housingassembly are not known by the manufacturer of the X-ray control and associatedhigh-voltage generator, he shall provide necessary information to allowthe assembler to determine the maximum line current for the particulartube housing assembly(s); (3) A statement of the technique factors that constitute the maximum linecurrent condition described in paragraph (g)(2) of this section. (h) <T3>Information to be provided for users. </T3>Manufacturers of X-ray equipmentshall provide for purchasers and, upon request, to others at a cost notto exceed the cost of publication and distribution, manuals or instructionsheets which shall include the following technical and safety information:(1) <T3>All X-ray equipment. </T3>For X-ray equipment to which this sectionand andSection;andSection; 1020.31, 1020.32, and 1020.33 are applicable, thereshall be provided: (i) Adequate instructions concerning any radiological safety proceduresand precautions which may be necessary because of unique features of theequipment; and (ii) A schedule of the maintenance necessary to keep the equipment in compliancewith this section and andgreater;andSection;andSection;  1020.31, 1020.32, and1020.33. (2) <T3>Tube housing assemblies. </T3>For each tube housing assembly, thereshall be provided: (i) Statements of the leakage technique factors for all combinations oftube housing assemblies and beam-limiting devices for which the tube housingassembly manufacturer states compatibility, the minimum filtration permanentlyin the useful beam expressed as millimeters of aluminum equivalent, andthe peak tube potential at which the aluminum equivalent was obtained;(ii) Cooling curves for the anode and tube housing; and (iii) Tube rating charts. If the tube is designed to operate from differenttypes of X-ray high-voltage generators (such as single-phase self-rectified,single-phase half-wave rectified, single-phase full-wave rectified, 3-phase6-pulse, 3-phase 12-pulse, constant potential, capacitor energy storage)or under modes of operation such as alternate focal spot sizes or speedsof anode rotation which affect its rating, specific identification of thedifference in ratings shall be noted. (3) <T3>X-ray controls and generators. </T3>For the X-ray control and associatedX-ray high voltage generator, there shall be provided: (i) A statement of the rated line voltage and the range of line-voltageregulation for operation at maximum line current; (ii) A statement of the maximum line current of the X-ray system basedon the maximum input voltage and current characteristics of the tube housingassembly compatible with rated output voltage and rated output currentcharacteristics of the X-ray control and associated high-voltage generator.If the rated input voltage and current characteristlcs of the tube housingassembly are not known by the manufacturer of the X-ray control and associatedhigh-voltage generator, the manufacturer shall provide necessary informationto allow the purchaser to determine the maximum line current for his particulartube housing assembly(s); (iii) A statement of the technique factors that constitute the maximumline current condition described in paragraph (h)(3)(ii) of this section;(iv) In the case of battery-powered generators, a specification of theminimum state of charge necessary for proper operation. (v) Generator rating and duty cycle; (vi) A statement of the maximum deviation from the preindication givenby labeled technique factor control settings or indicators during any radiographicor CT exposure where the equipment is connected to a power supply as describedin accordance with this paragraph. In the case of fixed technique factors,the maximum deviation from the nominal fixed value of each factor shallbe stated; (vii) A statement of the maximum deviation from the continuous indicationof X-ray tube potential and current during any fluoroscopic exposure whenthe equipment is connected to a power supply as described in accordancewith this paragraph; and(viii) A statement describing the measurement criteria for all techniquefactors used in paragraphs (h)(3) (iii), (vi), and (vii) of this section;for example, the beginning and end points of exposure time measured withrespect to a certain percentage of the voltage waveform. (4) <T3>Beam-limiting device.</T3> For each variable-aperature beam-limitingdevice, there shall be provided; (i) Leakage technique factors for all combinations of tube housing assembliesand beam-limiting devices for which the beam-limiting device manufacturerstates compatibility; and (ii) A statement including the minimum aluminum equivalent of that partof the device through which the useful beam passes and including the X-raytube potential at which the aluminum equivalent was obtained. When twoor more filters are provided as part of the device, the statement shallinclude the aluminum equivalent of each filter. (i) [Reserved] (j) <T3>Warning label.</T3> The control panel containing the main power switchshall bear the warning statement, legible and accessible to view: ``WARNING:This X-ray unit may be dangerous to patient and operator unless safe exposurefactors and operating instructions are observed.'' (k) <T3>Leakage radiation from the diagnostic source assembly.</T3> The leakageradiation from the diagnostic source assembly measured at a distance of1 meter in any direction from the source shall not exceed 2.58andmultiply;10^5kilogram (C/kg) (100 milliroentgens) in 1 hour when the X-ray tube is operatedat the leakage technique factors. If the maximum rated peak tube potentialof the tube housing assembly is greater than the maximum rated peak tubepotential for the diagnostic source assembly, positive means shall be providedto limit the maximum X-ray tube potential to that of the diagnostic sourceassembly. Compliance shall be determined by measurements averaged overan area of 0.01 square meter with no linear dimension greater than 200millimeters. (l) <T3>Radiation from components other than the diagnostic source assembly.</T3>The radiation emitted by a component other than the diagnostic source assemblyshall not exceed 5.16andmultiply;10^7 C/kg (2 milliroentgens) in 1 hour at50 millimeters from any accessible surface of the component when it isoperated in an assembled X-ray system under any conditions for which itwas designed. Compliance shall be determined by measurements averaged overan area of 0.01 square meter with no linear dimension greater than 200millimeters. (m) <T3>Beam quality</T3>_(1) <T3>Half-value layer.</T3> The half-value layer (HVL) of the useful beamfor a given X-ray tube potential shall not be less than the appropriatevalue shown in Table I under ``Specified dental systems,'' for any dentalX-ray system designed for use with intraoral image receptors and manufacturedafter December 1, 1980; and under ``Other X-ray systems,'' for all otherX-ray systems subject to this section. If it is necessary to determinesuch half-value layer at an X-ray tube potential which is not listed inTable I, linear interpolation or extrapolation may be made. Positive means\2\<NOTE/> shall be provided to insure that at least the minimum filtrationneeded to achieve the above beam quality requirements is in the usefulbeam during each exposure. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ In the case of a system which is to be operated with morethan one thickness of filtration, this requirement can be met by a filterinterlock with the kilovoltage selector which will prevent X-ray emissionif the minimum required filtration is not in place.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table I</T4><H1>X ray tube voltage (kilovolt peak) </H1><H2>Designed operating range </H2><H2>Measured operating potential </H2><H1>Minimum HVL (millimeters of aluminum) </H1><H2>Specified dental systems </H2><H2>Other x ray systems</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">Below 51 <D>30 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>0.3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>40 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>0.4</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>50 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>0.5</D><ITAG tagnum="1">51 to 70 <D>51 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>1.2</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>60 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>1.3</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>70 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>1.5</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Above 70 <D>71 </D><D>2.1 </D><D>2.1</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>80 </D><D>2.3 </D><D>2.3</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>90 </D><D>2.5 </D><D>2.5</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>100 </D><D>2.7 </D><D>2.7</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>110 </D><D>3.0 </D><D>3.0</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>120 </D><D>3.2 </D><D>3.2</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>130 </D><D>3.5 </D><D>3.5</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>140 </D><D>3.8 </D><D>3.8</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>150 </D><D>4.1 </D><D>4.1</D></ITAG>(2) <T3>Measuring compliance. </T3>For capacitor energy storage equipment,compliance shall be determined with the maximum selectable quantity ofcharge per exposure.(n) <T3>Aluminum equivalent of material between patient and image receptor.</T3>Except when used in a CT X-ray system, the aluminum equivalent of eachof the items listed in Table II, which are used between the patient andimage receptor, may not exceed the indicated limits. Compliance shall bedetermined by</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">X-ray measurements made at a potential of 100 kilovolts peak and withan X-ray beam that has a half-value layer of 2.7 millimeters of aluminum.This requirement applies to front panel(s) of cassette holders and filmchangers provided by the manufacturer for patient support or for preventionof foreign object intrusions. It does not apply to screens and their associatedmechanical support panels or grids.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s75,13</C><T4>Table II</T4><H1>Item </H1><H1>Aluminum equivalent (millimeters)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Front panel(s) of cassette holder (total of all) <D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Front panel(s) of film changer (total of all) <D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cradle <D>2.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop, stationary, without articulated joint(s) <D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop, movable, without articulated joint(s) (including stationarysubtop) <D>1.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop, with radiolucent panel having one articulated joint <D>1.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop, with radiolucent panel having two or more articulated joints<D>2.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop, cantilevered <D>2.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tabletop, radiation therapy simulator <D>5.0</D></ITAG></ITAG> (o) <T3>Battery charge indicator. </T3>On battery-powered generators, visualmeans shall be provided on the control panel to indicate whether the batteryis in a state of charge adequate for proper operation. (p) [Reserved] (q) <T3>Modification of certified diagnostic X-ray components and systems.</T3>(1) Diagnostic X-ray components and systems certified in accordancewith andSection;1010.2 of this chapter shall not be modified such that thecomponent or system fails to comply with any applicable provision of thischapter unless a variance in accordance with andSection;1010.4 of this chapteror an exemption under sections 358(a)(5) or 360B(b) of the Public HealthService Act has been granted. (2) The owner of a diagnostic X-ray system who uses the system in a professionalor commercial capacity may modify the system, provided the modificationdoes not result in the failure of the system or component to comply withthe applicable requirements of this section or of andSection;1020.31, andSection;1020.32,or andSection;1020.33. The owner who causes such modification need not submitthe reports required by Subpart B of Part 1002 of this chapter, providedthe owner records the date and the details of the modification, and providedthe modification of the X-ray system does not result in a failure to complywith andSection;1020.31, andSection;1020.32, or andSection;1020.33. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1020.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Radiographic equipment. </ITAG>The provisions of this section apply to equipment for the recording ofimages, except equipment involving use of an image intensifier or computedtomography X-ray systems manufactured on or after November 29, 1984. (a) <T3>Control and indication of technique factors_</T3>(1) <T3>Visual indication. </T3>The technique factors to be used during anexposure shall be indicated before the exposure begins, except when automaticexposure controls are used, in which case the technique factors which areset prior to the exposure shall be indicated. On equipment having fixedtechnique factors, this requirement may be met by permanent markings. Indicationof technique factors shall be visible from the operator's position exceptin the case of spot films made by the fluoroscopist. (2) <T3>Timers. </T3>Means shall be provided to terminate the exposure at apreset time interval, preset product of current and time, a preset numberof pulses, or a preset radiation exposure to the image receptor. (i) Except during serial radiography, the operator shall be able to terminatethe exposure at any time during an exposure of greater than one-half second.Termination of exposure shall cause automatic resetting of the timer toits initial setting or to zero. It shall not be possible to make an exposurewhen the timer is set to a zero or off position if either position is provided.(ii) During serial radiography, the operator shall be able to terminatethe X-ray exposure(s) at any time, but means may be provided to permitcompletion of any single exposure of the series in process. (3) <T3>Automatic exposure controls. </T3>When an automatic exposure controlis provided: (i) Indication shall be made on the control panel when this mode of operationis selected; (ii) When the X-ray tube potential is equal to or greater than 51 kilovoltspeak (kVp), the minimum exposure time for field emission equipment ratedfor pulsed operation shall be equal to or less than a time interval equivalentto two pulses and the minimum exposure time for all other equipment shallbe equal to or less than 1/60 second or a time interval required to delivery5 milliamperes seconds (mAs), whichever is greater; (iii) Either the product of peak X-ray tube potential, current, and exposuretime shall be limited to not more than 60 kilowatt seconds (kWs) per exposureor the product of X-ray tube current and exposure time shall be limitedto not more than 600 mAs per exposure except when the X-ray tube potentialis less than 51 kVp in which case the product of X-ray tube current andexposure time shall be limited to not more than 2,000 mAs per exposure;and (iv) A visible signal shall indicate when an exposure has been terminatedat the limits described in paragraph (a)(3)(iii) of this section, and manualresetting shall be required before further automatically timed exposurescan be made. (4) <T3>Accuracy. </T3>Deviation of technique factors from indicated valuesshall not exceed the limits given in the information provided in accordancewith andSection;1020.30(h)(3); (b) <T3>Reproducibility. </T3>The following requirements shall apply when theequipment is operated on an adequate power supply as specified by the manufacturerin accordance with the requirements of andSection;1020.30(h)(3); (1) <T3>Coefficient of variation. </T3>For any specific combination of selectedtechnique factors, the estimated coefficient of variation of radiationexposures shall be no greater than 0.05. (2) <T3>Measuring compliance. </T3>Determination of compliance shall be basedon 10 consecutive measurements taken with a time period of 1 hour. Equipmentmanufactured after September 5, 1978, shall be subject to the additionalrequirement that all variable controls for technique factors shall be adjustedto alternate settings and reset to the test setting after each measurement.The percent line-voltage regulation shall be determined for each measurement.All values for percent line-voltage regulation shall be within andplusmin;1of the mean value for all measurements. For equipment having automaticexposure controls, compliance shall be determined with a sufficient thicknessof attenuating material in the useful beam such that the technique factorscan be adjusted to provide individual exposures of a minimum of 12 pulseson field emission equipment rated for pulse operations or no less thanone-tenth second per exposure on all other equipment. (c) <T3>Linearity. </T3>The following requirements apply when the equipmentis operated on a power supply as specified by the manufacturer in accordancewith the requirements of andSection;1020.30(h)(3) for any fixed X-ray tubepotential within the range of 40 percent to 100 percent of the maximumrated. (1) <T3>Equipment having independent selection of X-ray tube current (mA).</T3>The average ratios of exposure to the indicated milliampere-secondsproduct (C/kg/mAs)) obtained at any two consecutive tube current settingshall not differ by more than 0.10 times their sum. This is:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">X<T2>1</T2>^X<T2>2</T2> andCx.190; 0.10(X<T2>1</T2>+X<T2>2</T2>); where X<T2>1</T2> and X<T2>2</T2> are the average C/kg/mAs (or mR/mAs)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">values obtained at each of two consecutive tube current settings orat two settings differing by no more than a factor of 2 where the tubecurrent selection is continuous. <ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Equipment having selection of X-ray tube current-exposure time product(mAs). </T3>The average ratios of exposure to the indicated milliampere-secondsproduct (C/kg/mAs (or mR/mAs)) obtained at any two consecutive mAs selectorsettings shall not differ by more than 0.10 times their sum. This is:</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">X<T2>1</T2>^X<T2>2</T2> 0.10(X<T2>1</T2>+X<T2>2</T2>); where X<T2>1</T2> and X<T2>2</T2> are the average C/kg/mAs (or mR/mAs)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">values obtained at each of two consecutive mAs selector settings orat two settings differing by no more than a factor of 2 where the mAs selectorprovides continuous selection. (3) <T3>Measuring compliance. </T3>Determination of compliance will be basedon 10 exposures, made within 1 hour, at each of the two settings. Thesetwo settings may include any two focal spot sizes, provided that neitherfocal spot size is equal to or less than 0.45 millimeter. For purposesof this requirement, focal spot size is the nominal focal spot size specifiedby the X-ray tube manufacturer. The percent line-voltage regulation shallbe determined for each measurement. All values for percent line-voltageregulation at any one combination of technique factors shall be withinandplusmin;1 of the mean value for all measurements at these technique factors.(d) <T3>Field limitation and alignment for mobile, portable, and stationarygeneral purpose X-ray systems. </T3>Except when spot-film devices or specialattachments for mammography are in service, mobile, portable, and stationarygeneral purpose radiographic X-ray systems shall meet the following requirements.(1) <T3>Variable X-ray field limitation. </T3>A means for stepless adjustmentof the size of the X-ray field shall be provided. Each dimension of theminimum field size at an SID of 1 meter shall be equal to or less than50 millimeters.(2) <T3>Visual definition. </T3>(i) Means for visually defining the perimeterof the X-ray field shall be provided. The total misalignment of the edgesof the visually defined field with the respective edges of the X-ray fieldalong either the length or width of the visually defined field shall notexceed 2 percent of the distance from the source to the center of the visuallydefined field when the surface upon which it appears is perpendicular tothe axis of the X-ray beam.(ii) When a light localizer is used to define the X-ray field, it shallprovide an average illumination of not less than 100 lux (9.3 foot candles)at 1 meter or at the maximum source-image receptor distance (SID), whicheveris less. The average illumination shall be based upon measurements madein the approximate center of each quadrant of the light field. Radiationtherapy simulation systems are exempt from this requirement.(iii) The edge of the light field at 1 meter or at the maximum SID, whicheveris less, shall have a contrast ratio, corrected for ambient lighting, ofnot less than 4 in the case of beam-limiting devices designed for use onstationary equipment, and a contrast ratio of not less than 3 in the caseof beam-limiting devices designed for use on mobile and portable equipment.The contrast ratio is defined as I<T2>1</T2>/I<T2>2 </T2>where I<T2>1 </T2>is the illumination 3 millimeters from the edge of the lightfield toward the center of the field; and I<T2>2 </T2>is the illumination 3 millimeters from the edge of the lightfield away from the center of the field. Compliance shall be determinedwith a measuring aperture of 1 millimeter.(e) <T3>Field indication and alignment on stationary general purpose X-rayequipment. </T3>Except when spot-film devices or special attachments formammography are in service, stationary general purpose X-ray systems shallmeet the following requirements in addition to those prescribed in paragraph(d) of this section.(1) Means shall be provided to indicate when the axis of the X-ray beamis perpendicular to the plane of the image receptor, to align the centerof the X-ray field with respect to the center of the image receptor towithin 2 percent of the SID, and to indicate the SID to within 2 percent;(2) The beam-limiting device shall numerically indicate the field sizein the plane of the image receptor to which it is adjusted;(3) Indication of field size dimensions and SID's shall be specified inmeters, or centimeters, and/or inches and shall be such that aperture adjustmentsresult in X-ray field dimensions in the plane of the image receptor whichcorrespond to those indicated by the beam-limiting device to within 2 percentof the SID when the beam axis is indicated to be perpendicular to the planeof the image receptor; and(4) Compliance measurements will be made at discrete SID's and image receptordimensions in common clinical use (such as SID's of 1.0, 1.5, and 2.0 metersand/or 36, 40, 48, and 72 inches and nominal image receptor dimensionsof 130, 180, 240, 300, 350, 400, and 430 millimeters and/or 5, 7, 8, 9,10, 11, 12, 14, and 17 inches) or at any other specific dimensions at whichthe beam-limiting device or its associated diagnostic X-ray system is uniquelydesigned to operate.(f) <T3>Field limitation on radiographic</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T3>X-ray equipment other than general purpose radiographic systems_(1)Equipment for use with intraoral image receptors. </T3>Radiographic equipmentdesigned for use with an intraoral image receptor shall be provided withmeans to limit the X-ray beam such that:(i) If the minimum source-to-skin distance (SSD) is 180 millimeters ormore, the X-ray field at the minimum SSD shall be containable in a circlehaving a diameter of no more than 70 millimeters; and(ii) If the minimum SSD is less than 180 millimeters, the X-ray field atthe minimum SSD shall be containable in a circle having a diameter of nomore than 60 millimeters.(2) <T3>X-ray systems designed for one image receptor size. </T3>Radiographicequipment designed for only one image receptor size at a fixed SID shallbe provided with means to limit the field at the plane of the image receptorto dimensions no greater than those of the image receptor, and to alignthe center of the X-ray field with the center of the image receptor towithin 2 percent of the SID or shall be provided with means to both sizeand align the X-ray field such that the X-ray field at the plane of theimage receptor does not extend beyond any edge of the image receptor.(3) <T3>Systems designed for or provided with special attachments for mammography.</T3>Radiographic systems designed only for mammography and general purposeradiographic systems, when special attachments for mammography are in service,shall be provided with means to limit the useful beam such that the X-rayfield at the plane of the image receptor does not extend beyond any edgeof the image receptor at any designated SID except the edge of the imagereceptor designed to be adjacent to the chest wall where the X-ray fieldmay not extend beyond this edge by more than 2 percent of the SID. Thisrequirement can be met with a system which performs as prescribed in paragraphs(f)(4)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this section. When the beam-limiting deviceand image receptor support device are designed to be used to immobilizethe breast during a mammographic procedure and the SID may vary, the SIDindication specified in paragraphs (f)(4)(ii) and (iii) of this sectionshall be the maximum SID for which the beam-limiting device or apertureis designed. In addition, each image receptor support intended for installationon a system designed only for mammography shall have clear and permanentmarkings to indicate the maximum image receptor size for which it is designed.(4) <T3>Other X-ray systems. </T3>Radiographic systems not specifically coveredin paragraphs (d), (e), (f) (2) and (3), and (h) of this section and systemscovered in paragraph (f)(1) of this section, which are also designed foruse with extraoral image receptors and when used with an extraoral imagereceptor, shall be provided with means to limit the X-ray field in theplane of the image receptor so that such field does not exceed each dimensionof the image receptor by more than 2 percent of the SID, when the axisof the X-ray beam is perpendicular to the plane of the image receptor.In addition, means shall be provided to align the center of the X-ray fieldwith the center of the image receptor to within 2 percent of the SID, ormeans shall be provided to both size and align the X-ray field such thatthe X-ray field at the plane of the image receptor does not extend beyondany edge of the image receptor. These requirements may be met with:(i) A system which performs in accordance with paragraphs (d) and (e) ofthis section; or when alignment means are also provided, may be met witheither;(ii) An assortment of removable, fixed-aperture, beam-limiting devicessufficient to meet the requirement for each combination of image receptorsize and SID for which the unit is designed. Each such device shall haveclear and permanent markings to indicate the image receptor size and SIDfor which it is designed; or(iii) A beam-limiting device having multiple fixed apertures sufficientto meet the requirement for each combination of image receptor size andSID for which the unit is designed. Permanent, clearly legible markingsshall indicate the image receptor size and SID for which each apertureis designed and shall indicate which aperture is in position for use.(g) <T3>Positive beam limitation (PBL). </T3>The requirements of this paragraphshall apply to radiographic systems which contain a PBL system.(1) <T3>Field size. </T3>When a PBL system is provided, it shall prevent X-rayproduction when:(i) Either the length or width of the X-ray field in the plane of the imagereceptor differs from the corresponding image receptor dimension by morethan 3 percent of the SID; or(ii) The sum of the length and width differences as stated in paragraph(g)(1)(i) of this section without regard to sign exceeds 4 percent of theSID.(2) <T3>Conditions for PBL. </T3>When provided, the PBL system shall functionas described in paragraph (g)(1) of this section whenever all the followingconditions are met:(i) The image receptor is inserted into a permanently mounted cassetteholder;(ii) The image receptor length and width are less than 0.5 meter;(iii) The X-ray beam axis is within andplusmin;3 degrees of vertical andthe SID is 0.9 meter to 1.3 meter inclusive; or the X-ray beam axis iswithn andplusmin;3 degrees of horizontal and the SID is 0.9 meter to 2.05meters inclusive;(iv) The X-ray beam axis is perpendicular to the plane of the image receptorto within andplusmin;3 degrees; and(v) Neither tomographic nor stereoscopic radiography is being performed.(3) <T3>Measuring compliance. </T3>Compliance with the requirements of paragraph(g)(1) of this section shall be determined when the equipment indicatesthat the beam axis is perpendicular to the plane of the image receptorand the provisions of paragraph (g)(2) of this section are met. Complianceshall be determined no sooner than 5 seconds after insertion of the imagereceptor.(4) <T3>Operator initiated undersizing. </T3>The PBL system shall be capableof operation such that, at the discretion of the operator, the size ofthe field may be made smaller than the size of the image receptor throughstepless adjustment of the field size. Each dimension of the minimum fieldsize at an SID of 1 meter shall be equal to or less than 50 millimeters.Return to PBL function as described in paragraph (g)(1) of this sectionshall occur automatically upon any change of image receptor size or SID.(5) <T3>Override of PBL. </T3>A capability may be provided for overriding PBLin case of system failure and for servicing the system. This override maybe for all SID's and image receptor sizes. A key shall be required forany override capability that is accessible to the operator. It shall notbe possible to remove the key while the PBL is overridden. Each such keyswitch or key shall be clearly and durably labeled as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">For X-Ray Field Limitation System Failure</ITAG>The override capability is considered accessible to the operator if itis referenced in the operator's manual or in other material intended forthe operator or if its location is such that the operator would considerit part of the operational controls.(h) <T3>Field limitation and alignment for spot-film devices. </T3>The followingrequirements shall apply to spot-film devices, except when the spot-filmdevice is provided for use with a radiation therapy simulation system:(1) Means shall be provided between the source and the patient for adjustmentof the X-ray field size in the plane of the image receptor to the sizeof that portion of the image receptor which has been selected on the spot-filmselector. Such adjustment shall be accomplished automatically when theX-ray field size in the plane of the image receptor is greater than theselected portion of the image receptor. If the X-ray field size is lessthan the size of the selected portion of the image receptor, the fieldsize shall not open automatically to the size of the selected portion ofthe image receptor unless the operator has selected that mode of operation.(2) Neither the length nor the width of the X-ray field in the plane ofthe image receptor shall differ from the corresponding dimensions of theselected portion of the image receptor by more than 3 percent of the SIDwhen adjusted for full coverage of the selected portion of the image receptor.The sum, without regard to sign, of the length and width differences shallnot exceed 4 percent of the SID. On spot-film devices manufactured afterFebruary 25, 1978, if the angle between the plane of the image receptorand beam axis is variable, means shall be provided to indicate when theaxis of the X-ray beam is perpendicular to the plane of the image receptor,and compliance shall be determined with the beam axis indicated to be perpendicularto the plane of the image receptor.(3) The center of the X-ray field in the plane of the image receptor shallbe aligned with the center of the selected portion of the image receptorto within 2 percent of the SID.(4) Means shall be provided to reduce the X-ray field size in the planeof the image receptor to a size smaller than the selected portion of theimage receptor such that:(i) For spot-film devices used on fixed-SID fluoroscopic systems whichare not required to, and do not provide stepless adjustment of the X-rayfield, the minimum field size, at the greatest SID, does not exceed 0.0125square meter; or (ii) For spot-film devices used on fluoroscopic systems that have a variableSID and/or stepless adjustment of the field size, each dimension of theminimum field size, at the greatest SID, does not exceed 50 millimeters.(5) A capability may be provided for overriding the automatic X-ray fieldsize adjustment in case of system failure. If it is so provided, a signalvisible at the fluoroscopist's position shall indicate whenever the automaticX-ray field size adjustment override is engaged. Each such system failureoverride switch shall be clearly labeled as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">For X-Ray Field Limitation System Failure</ITAG>(i) <T3>Source-skin distance. </T3>(1) X-ray systems designed for use withan intraoral image receptor shall be provided with means to limit source-to-skindistance to not less than:(i) One hundred eighty millimeters if operable above 50 kVp, or(ii) One hundred millimeters if not operable above 50 kVp.(2) Mobile or portable X-ray systems other than dental shall be providedwith means to limit source-to-skin distance to not less than 300 millimeters.(j) <T3>Beam-on indicators. </T3>The X-ray control shall provide visual indicationwhenever X-rays are produced. In addition, a signal audible to the operatorshall indicate that the exposure has terminated.(k) <T3>Multiple tubes. </T3>Where two or more radiographic tubes are controlledby one exposure switch, the tube or tubes which have been selected shallbe clearly indicated before initiation of the exposure. This indicationshall be both on the X-ray control and at or near the tube housing assemblywhich has been selected.(l) <T3>Radiation from capacitor energy storage equipment. </T3>Radiation emittedfrom the X-ray tube shall not exceed:(1) 7.7 andmultiply; 10^9 C/kg (0.03 milliroentgens) in 1 minute at 50 millimetersfrom any accessible surface of the diagnostic source assembly, with thebeam-limiting device fully open, the system fully charged, and the exposureswitch, timer, or any discharge mechanism not activated. Compliance shallbe determined by measurements averaged over an area of 0.01 square meteror less, with no linear dimension greater than 200 millimeters; and(2) 2.58 andmultiply; 10^5 C/kg (100 milliroentgens) in 1 hour at 1 meterfrom the X-ray source, with the beam-limiting device fully open, when thesystem is discharged through the X-ray tube either manually or automaticallyby use of a discharge switch or deactivation of the input power. Complianceshall be determined by measurements of the maximum exposure per dischargemultiplied by the total number of discharges in 1 hour (duty cycle). Themeasurements shall be averaged over an area of 0.01 square meter or less,with no linear dimension greater than 200 millimeters.(m) <T3>Transmission limit for image receptor supporting devices used for mammography.</T3>For X-ray systems manufactured after September 5, 1978, which aredesigned only for mammography, the transmission of the primary beam throughany image receptor support provided with the system shall be limited suchthat the exposure 50 millimeters from any accessible surface beyond theplane of the image receptor supporting device does not exceed 2.58 andmultiply;10^8 C/kg (0.1 milliroentgen) for each activation of the tube. Exposureshall be measured with the system operated at the minimum SID for whichit is designed. Compliance shall be determined at the maximum rated peaktube potential for the system and at the maximum rated product of the tubecurrent and exposure time (mAs) for that peak tube potential. Complianceshall be determined by measurements averaged over an area of 0.01 squaremeter with no linear dimension greater than 200 millimeters.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1020.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fluoroscopic equipment.</ITAG>The provisions of this section apply to equipment for fluoroscopy and forthe recording of images through an image intensifier except computed tomographyX-ray systems manufactured on or after November 29, 1984.(a) <T3>Primary protective barrier</T3>_(1) <T3>Limitation of useful beam. </T3>The fluoroscopic imaging assembly shallbe provided with a primary protective barrier which intercepts the entirecross section of the useful beam at any SID. The X-ray tube used for fluoroscopyshall not produce X-rays unless the barrier is in position to interceptthe entire useful beam. The exposure rate due to transmission through thebarrier with the attenuation block in the useful beam combined with radiationfrom the image intensifier, if provided, shall not exceed 0.00334 percentof the entrance exposure rate, at a distance of 100 millimeters from anyaccessible surface of the fluoroscopic imaging assembly beyond the planeof the image receptor. Radiation therapy simulation systems shall be exemptfrom this requirement provided the systems are intended only for remotecontrol operation and the manufacturer sets forth instructions for assemblerswith respect to control location as part of the information required inandSection; 1020.30(g). Additionally, the manufacturer shall provide to users,pursuant to 1020.30(h)(1)(i), precautions concerning the importance ofremote control operation.(2) <T3>Measuring compliance.</T3> The entrance exposure rate shall be measuredin accordance with paragraph (d) of this section. The exposure rate dueto transmission through the primary barrier combined with radiation fromthe image intensifier shall be determined by measurements averaged overan area of 0.01 square meter with no linear dimension greater than 200millimeters. If the source is below the tabletop, the measurement shallbe made with the input surface of the fluoroscopic imaging assembly positioned300 millimeters above the table top. If the source is above the tabletopand the SID is variable, the measurement shall be made with the end ofthe beam-limiting device or spacer as close to the tabletop as it can beplaced, provided that it shall not be closer than 300 millimeters. Movablegrids and compression devices shall be removed from the useful beam duringthe measurement. For all measurements, the attenuation block shall be positionedin the useful beam 100 millimeters from the point of measurement of entranceexposure rate and between this point and the input surface of the fluoroscopicimaging assembly.(b) <T3>Field limitation</T3>_(1) <T3>Nonimage-intensified fluoroscopy.</T3> (i) The X-ray field producedby nonimage-intensified fluoroscopic equipment shall not extend beyondthe entire visible area of the image receptor. Means shall be providedfor stepless adjustment of the field size. Each dimension of the minimumfield size, at the greatest SID, shall be equal to or less than 50 millimeters.(ii) For equipment manufactured after February 25, 1978, when the anglebetween the image receptor and the beam axis of the X-ray beam is variable,means shall be provided to indicate when the axis of the X-ray beam isperpendicular to the plane of the image receptor. Compliance with paragraph(b)(1)(i) of this section shall be determined with the beam axis indicatedto be perpendicular to the plane of the image receptor.(2) <T3>Image-intensified fluoroscopy.</T3> (i) For image-intensified fluoroscopicequipment other than radiation therapy simulation systems, neither thelength nor the width of the X-ray field in the plane of the image receptorshall exceed that of the visible area of the image receptor by more than3 percent of the SID. The sum of the excess length and the excess widthshall be no greater than 4 percent of the SID.(ii) For rectangular X-ray fields used with circular image receptors, theerror in alignment shall be determined along the length and width dimensionsof the X-ray field which pass through the center of the visible area ofthe image receptor.(iii) For equipment manufactured after February 25, 1978, when the anglebetween the image receptor and beam axis is variable, means shall be providedto indicate when the axis of the X-ray beam is perpendicular to the planeof the image receptor. Compliance with paragraph (b)(2)(i) of this sectionshall be determined with the beam axis indicated to be perpendicular tothe plane of the image receptor.(iv) Means shall be provided to permit further limitation of the field.Beam-limiting devices manufactured after May 22, 1979, and incorporatedin equipment with a variable SID and/or the capability of a visible areaof greater than 0.03 square meter shall be provided with means for steplessadjustment of the X-ray field. Equipment with a fixed SID and the capabilityof a visible area of no greater than 0.03 square meter shall be providedwith either stepless adjustment of the X-ray field or with a means to furtherlimit the X-ray field size at the plane of the image receptor to 0.0125square meter or less. Stepless adjustment shall, at the greatest SID, providecontinuous field sizes from the maximum obtainable to a field size witheach dimension 50 millimeters or less.(3) If the fluoroscopic X-ray field size is adjusted automatically as theSID or image receptor size is changed, a capability may be provided foroverriding the automatic adjustment in case of system failure. If it isso provided, a signal visible at the fluoroscopist's position shall indicatewhenever the automatic field adjustment is overridden. Each such systemfailure override switch shall be clearly labeled as follows:<ITAG tagnum="81">For X-Ray Field Limitation System Failure</ITAG>(c) <T3>Activation of tube.</T3> X-ray production in the fluoroscopic modeshall be controlled by a device which requires continuous pressure by theoperator for the entire time of any exposure. When recording serial fluoroscopicimages, the operator shall be able to terminate the X-ray exposure(s) atany time, but means may be provided to permit completion of any singleexposure of the series in process.(d) <T3>Entrance exposure rate limits</T3>_(1) <T3>Equipment with automatic exposure rate control (AERC).</T3> Exceptfor fluoroscopic radiation therapy simulation systems, fluoroscopic equipmentwhich is provided with AERC shall not be operable at any combination oftube potential and current which will result in an exposure rate in excessof 2.58 andmultiply; 10^\3\ coulombs per kilogram (C/kg) (10 roentgens perminute) (10 R/min) at the point where the center of the useful beam entersthe patient, except:(i) During recording of fluoroscopic images, or(ii) When an optional high level control is provided. When so provided,the equipment, shall not be operable at any combination of tube potentialand current which will result in an exposure rate in excess of 1.29 andmultiply;10^\3\ C/kg per minute (5 R/min) at the point where the center of the usefulbeam enters the patient, unless the high level control is activated. Specialmeans of activation of high level controls shall only be operable whencontinuous manual activation is provided by the operator. A continuoussignal audible to the fluoroscopist shall indicate that the high levelcontrol is being employed.(2) <T3>Equipment without AERC (manual mode).</T3> Except for fluoroscopicradiation therapy simulation systems, fluoroscopic equipment which is notprovided with AERC shall not be operable at any combination of tube potentialand current which will result in an exposure rate in excess of 1.29 andmultiply;10^\3\ C/kg per minute (5 R/min) at the point where the center of the usefulbeam enters the patient, except:(i) During recording of fluoroscopic images, or(ii) When an optional high level control is activated. Special means ofactivation of high level controls shall be required. The high level controlshall only be operable when continuous manual activation is provided bythe operator. A continuous signal audible to the fluoroscopist shall indicatethat the high level control is being employed.(3) <T3>Equipment with both an AERC mode and a manual mode.</T3> Except forfluoroscopic radiation therapy simulation systems, fluoroscopic equipmentwhich is provided with both an AERC mode and a manual mode shall not beoperable at any combination of tube potential and current which will resultin an exposure rate in excess of 2.58 andmultiply; 10^3 C/kg per minute (10R/min) in either mode at the point where the center of the useful beamenters the patient except:(i) During recording of fluoroscopic images, or(ii) When the mode or modes have an optional high level control, in whichcase that mode or modes shall not be operable at any combination of tubepotential and current which will result in an exposure rate in excess of1.29 X 10^3 C/kg per minute (5 R/min) at the point where the center ofthe useful beam enters the patient, unless the high level control is activated.Special means of activation of high level controls shall only be operablewhen continuous manual activation is provided by the operator. A continuoussignal, audible to the fluoroscopist, shall indicate that the high levelcontrol is being employed.(4) <T3>Measuring compliance.</T3> Compliance with paragraph (d) of this sectionshall be determined as follows:(i) If the source is below the X-ray table, the exposure rate shall bemeasured at 10 millimeters above the tabletop or cradle.(ii) If the source is above the X-ray table, the exposure rate shall bemeasured at 300 millimeters above the tabletop with the end of the beam-limitingdevice or spacer positioned as closely as possible to the point of measurement.(iii) In a C-arm type of fluoroscope, the exposure rate shall be measuredat 300 millimeters from the input surface of the fluoroscopic imaging assembly,with the source positioned at any available SID, provided that the endof the beam-limiting device or spacer is no closer than 300 millimetersfrom the input surface of the fluoroscopic imaging assembly.(iv) In a lateral type of fluoroscope, the exposure rate shall be measuredat a point 150 millimeters from the centerline of the X-ray table and inthe direction of the X-ray source with the end of the beam-limiting deviceor spacer positioned as closely as possible to the point of measurement.If the tabletop is movable, it shall be positioned as closely as possibleto the lateral X-ray source, with the end of the beam-limiting device orspacer no closer than 150 millimeters to the centerline of the X-ray table.(e) <T3>Indication of potential and current.</T3> During fluoroscopy and cinefluorography,X-ray tube potential and current shall be continuously indicated. Deviationof X-ray tube potential and current from the indicated values shall notexceed the maximum deviation as stated by the manufacturer in accordancewith andSection; 1020.30(h)(3).(f) <T3>Source-skin distance.</T3> Means shall be provided to limit the source-skindistance to not less than 380 millimeters on stationary fluoroscopes andto not less than 300 millimeters on mobile or portable fluoroscopes. Inaddition, for image-intensified fluoroscopes intended for specific surgicalapplication that would be prohibited at the source-skin distances specifiedin this paragraph, provisions may be made for operation at shorter source-skindistances but in no case less than 200 millimeters. When provided, themanufacturer must set forth precautions with respect to the optional meansof spacing, in addition to other information as required in andSection; 1020.30(h).(g) <T3>Fluoroscopic timer.</T3> Means shall be provided to preset the cumulativeon-time of the fluoroscopic tube. The maximum cumulative time of the timingdevice shall not exceed 5 minutes without resetting. A signal audible tothe fluoroscopist shall indicate the completion of any preset cumulativeon-time. Such signal shall continue to sound while X-rays are produceduntil the timing device is reset. As an alternative to the requirementsof this paragraph, radiation therapy simulation systems may be providedwith a means to indicate the total cumulative exposure time during whichX-rays were produced, and which is capable of being reset between X-rayexaminations.(h) <T3>Mobile or portable fluoroscopes.</T3> In addition to the foregoingrequirements of this section, mobile or portable fluoroscopes shall provideintensified imaging.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: August 30, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Ronald G. Chesemore,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Associate Commissioner for Regulatory Affairs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-24366 Filed 10-16-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4160-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>